Final Environmental Impact Statement Elwha River Ecosystem Restoration Olympic National Park June 1995 Contents _______________________________________________________________________ Purpose and Need: The Elwha River ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries are severely degraded as a result of two hydroelectric dams (projects) and their reservoirs built in the early 1900s.
Congress has mandated the full restoration of this ecosystem and its native anadromous fisheries through the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act (Public Law 102-495).
The Department of the Interior therefore finds there is a need to return this river and the ecosystem to its natural, self-regulating state, and proposes removing both dams to accomplish this purpose and fulfill the congressional mandate.
Proposed Action: The U.S. Department of the Interior proposes to fully restore the Elwha River ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries through the decommissioning of Elwha Dam and Glines Canyon Dam and removal of all structures necessary, including all or part of both dams, powerhouses, reservoirs, and associated facilities to achieve this purpose.
The proposed action is located in Clallam County, on the Olympic Peninsula, in Washington State.
Lead agency: National Park Service
Cooperating agencies: U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, U.S. Bureau of Reclamation, U.S. Bureau of Indian Affairs, U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, and the Lower Elwha SKlallam Tribe
Type of statement: This is a final environmental impact statement.
In preparing this, the Department of the Interior has adopted the majority of a draft environmental impact statement titled "Proposed Elwha (FERC No.2683) and Glines Canyon (FERC No.588) Hydroelectric Projects, Washington" as updated and renamed Draft Staff Report in March 1993 prepared by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.
Also incorporated into the record of this environmental impact statement is the Elwha Report and its appendixes, prepared by the U.S. departments of the Interior and Commerce and the Lower Elwha SKlallam Tribe (Jan. 1994).
This environmental impact statement supersedes both the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission environmental impact statement and the Elwha Report.
Abstract: In addition to the proposed action, four other alternatives are examined.
They are: Dam Retention with mitigation measures installed for fish passage, Removing Glines Canyon Dam only and installing fish passage measures at Elwha Dam, Removing Elwha Dam only and installing fish passage measures at Glines Canyon Dam, and No Action (dams are retained without fish passage measures).
The proposed action is also the Department of the Interiors "preferred alternative."
Short term negative impacts from removing both dams could occur from sediment built up behind them.
If sediment is allowed to erode naturally, the finer grained particles, such as silt and clay, could temporarily but significantly impact fish or other aquatic organisms.
Impacts on water quality, river morphology, native anadromous and resident (i.e., trout and char) fisheries, living marine resources, wildlife, threatened and endangered species, vegetation, cultural resources, land use, recreation, esthetics, socioeconomics and river ecology are also examined in this environmental impact statement.
Alternatives other than the proposed action may also have significant impacts on each of these resources.
Difference between the Final and Draft Environmental Impact Statement: Comments were taken both orally and in writing for a period of 60 days on the draft environmental impact statement released in October 1994.
The comment period ended December 23, 1994.
Substantive comments were responded to both in a question and answer format and/or by making changes, additions or corrections in the text of the draft environmental impact statement.
The changed draft is this document, Interiors final environmental impact statement.
[Page numbering retained, (Word Document = hardcopy)] Pg. 2 = pg. 0
Summary
In the early 1900s, the free-flowing Elwha River on the Olympic Peninsula in Washington State was blocked with two hydroelectric dams (See Figure 1).
The Elwha Dam was built 4.9 miles from the mouth of the Elwha River beginning in September 1910.
It impounded the reservoir known as Lake Aldwell.
Construction on Glines Canyon Dam, 8.5 miles farther upstream, began in 1926, creating the reservoir known as Lake Mills.
Although the dams helped in the early development of the peninsula, the presence and operation of the hydropower projects cause severe problems for anadromous fish, the ecosystem, and the Lower Elwha SKlallam Tribe.
The dams block the migration path for several species of salmon and trout, which, after maturing in the ocean, return to the Elwha to lay their eggs (spawn).
Migrating fish such as these are anadromous.
The dams also prevent or limit the downstream flow of nutrients, sediment, and woody debris the fish need to successfully spawn and rear juveniles, inundate fish habitat and result in elevated temperatures downstream.
The Elwha River was used by 10 runs of salmon and trout before the dams were built.
The fish fed more than 22 species of wildlife and were the basis of much of the culture and economy of the Lower Elwha SKlallam Tribe.
Because of the dams, the flow regime of the river changed from active meandering in many places to less active and more channelized.
Reduced sediment supply from the river has caused the eastern edge of the pre-dam Elwha delta to erode, and the barrier beach at Freshwater Bay to recede and steepen.
It has also contributed to the erosion of Ediz Hook, the sand spit that protects Port Angeles Harbor.
In recognition of these problems, the Department of the Interior finds, consistent with congressional intent expressed in the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act (P.L. 102-495; see Appendix), a need to fully restore the native anadromous fisheries and Elwha River ecosystem.
For the purposes of Elwha River restoration, "full restoration" is interpreted by the Department of the Interior to mean reestablishment of natural physical and biological ecosystem processes, including recovery of the terrestrial and riverine habitat currently inundated by the reservoirs.
Since the wildlife habitat and river upstream of the dams are in nearly pristine condition, removing the dams and fully restoring the 10 runs of salmon and trout would fully restore the Elwha River ecosystem.
It would also return the cultural and economic focus of the Lower Elwha SKlallam Tribe, uphold the federal trust responsibility to affected Indian tribes, and provide substantial long term benefits to sport fishing, tourism, and the local economies associated with these activities.
The National Park Service has the lead in preparing this final environmental impact statement, which is a programmatic or policy environmental impact statement.
The majority of the March 1993 Federal Energy Regulatory Commission Draft Staff Report was adopted as part of this document.
The Elwha Report and its appendixes, prepared by the U.S. departments of the Interior and Commerce and the Lower Elwha SKlallam Tribe (Jan. 1994), were also incorporated.
Material in this document supersedes both that in the Draft Staff Report and in the Elwha Report.
pg.ii 
If the decision maker, the secretary of the interior; chooses the Proposed Action of removing both dams, the National Park Service will prepare a second environmental impact statement, the "Implementation EIS," that would examine options for implementing the decision.
Several alternatives for restoring fish habitat are examined in this programmatic impact statement.
Only one alternative has the potential to fully restore Elwha native anadromous fisheriesthe Proposed Action of removing both the Elwha and Glines Canyon dams.
Chances for restoring nine of the ten runs of fish are rated as either "good" or "excellent" if both dams are removed (sockeye salmon suffer from potential stock limitation and habitat problems outside the confines of the Elwha River project and, therefore, have only "poor" to "fair" chances of returning in pre-dam numbers).
Removing both dams would also restore natural flow conditions in the Elwha River.
Figure 1.
Location Map
Because federal agencies examine a full range of reasonable alternatives in an environmental impact statement, the National Park Service also analyzed leaving the dams in place and installing fish passage facilities, as well as removing each dam separately.
These alternatives are Dam Retention (with passage facilities installed at both dams), Removal of Elwha Dam, and Removal of Glines Canyon Dam.
No Action, or leaving the dams in place without mitigation measures (as they are now), was also analyzed to provide a basis for comparing all action alternatives.
The chances of restoring native anadromous fish drop substantially under each of these alternatives.
None of the ten runs has a good or excellent chance of full restoration if fish passage measures are installed (i.e., the Dam Retention alternative) or if Elwha Dam alone is removed.
Although there is a good chance that both winter and summer runs of steelhead could be restored if Glines Canyon Dam were removed, the remaining eight runs do not fare as well.
For all alternatives except Proposed Action, mortality associated with fish passage and poor habitat is likely to drive the Elwha pink salmon stock to extinction (if it is not already) and chum salmon stock to extremely low levels or extinction.
Anadromous fish populations would return to normal if the dams were removed, and other features of the ecosystem would benefit as well.
Natural sediment transport conditions would be reestablished if the dams were removed.
This would restore needed spawning gravel and woody debris for fish, and also replace sand missing from the rivers estuary, nearby beaches, and the nearshore environment as far east as Ediz Hook.
The estuary would grow to its pre-dam size and once again serve as an important transitional habitat between fresh and salt water for many species of fish and other aquatic organisms.
Instead of a stable channel, the Elwha River would return to its active meandering morphology, creating the riffles, pools, and slower moving side channels that many anadromous fish prefer for spawning and rearing.
Draining the reservoirs and returning the river and surrounding land to pre-dam conditions would reduce downstream temperatures in the river; immediately restore more than five miles of stream habitat, and provide access to 70 miles of usable river, greatly benefiting fish.
Within three years, revegetation of the reservoir lands would take firm hold; natural succession of a mix of riparian and upland terrestrial habitat would start.
Now, 715 acres of potential wildlife habitat are occupied by the reservoirs and dam facilities.
If the dams were removed, these acres would return for use by native mammals and other terrestrial species.
Pg. 4 = pg.iv
With the reintroduction of salmon and trout throughout the rivers length, wildlife would again benefit from the year-round, stable food source these fish once provided.
Threatened or endangered animals such as bald eagles would benefit directly from an increase in available prey, others from the creation of additional habitat.
Eventually, restored forest lands would benefit the threatened marbled murrelet and northern spotted owl.
Some negative impacts might occur from the Proposed Action.
The dams are considered a historic resource, as they are examples of early hydropower plants.
Although important features would be documented and recorded, removal would result in the loss of the dams and power plants.
The average annual power produced, 172 gigawatts, or 43% of the power needs for the Daishowa paper and pulp mill in Port Angeles, would also be lost.
The reservoirs, which would be drained if the dams are removed, are a recreational resource to flat-water boaters and anglers, as well as winter habitat for the trumpeter swan.
With the dams gone, sediment built up over the last 80 years would be released into the river, though finer sediment could be dredged and removed.
If fine sediments (silt and clay) were released uncontrolled, they could kill adult and juvenile fish, their eggs, and other aquatic life.
This would be a temporary but severe impact.
Released sediment could also affect surface water users, including the city of Port Angeles and its industrial customers.
Several mitigation options are under consideration for analysis in the Implementation EIS, but the Department of the Interior is bound by the Elwha Restoration Act (i.e. the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act; PL 102-495) to ensure that municipal and industrial users are protected from adverse impacts to existing water quality and availability that might occur if the dams were removed.
If the dams were removed and upstream sediment flowed into the middle and lower river, the riverbed itself might rise to pre-dam levels, which has been estimated to be on the order of 1 to 5 feet above the present level.
A raised riverbed would raise the water level also, and localized flooding could occur more frequently.
In addition to achieving the congressionally mandated goal of restoring both the native anadromous fisheries and ecosystem, the Proposed Action would have long-term positive impacts on the local economy through increases in tourism, commercial and recreational fishing; river recreational access; improvement of esthetics; uncovering of tribal cultural resources now buried or inaccessible; and aiding the very depressed tribal economy.
Any potential safety risk posed by the dams (although now considered safe, earthquake risk is being reexamined) would be eliminated.
The volume of water currently available to users, and high flow volumes (i.e., large floods) would remain the same as now, as the dams have a very limited ability to store water.
Pg. 5 = pg.v
The following discussion summarizes environmental problems that each alternative might create for a particular resource (such as water quality).
A comparison of impacts, or the extent of these problems, for each alternative is located in chart form beginning on p.22^ of this document.
Summary of Issues
Issues are environmental problems which might occur if the Proposed Action or any of the alternatives are undertaken.
The expected extent of these problems is called impact.
Impact analyses predict how severely a particular environmental resource (i.e., water quality) would be affected with implementation of each alternative.
A description of issues follows; impacts are discussed in the chapter titled "Impacts of Each Alternative".
Geology, River Morphology, Hydrology 
The dams have limited coarse-grained sediment and woody debris from flowing downstream of river mile 13.4, the location of Glines Canyon Dam.
As a result, cobbles, gravel, and sand have built up in deltas where the river or tributaries enter the reservoirs.
Salmon and trout are denied the spawning gravel needed to successfully reproduce.
Erosion of coastal features such as Ediz Hook and beaches near the mouth of the river is exacerbated.
Approximately 17 million cubic yards of clay, silt, sand, gravel, and cobbles are now (1994) trapped in the two reservoirs, most behind Glines Canyon Dam.
Some portion of this sediment would be released into the river should the Proposed Action or single dam removal alternatives be implemented.
The Elwha Report investigates three ways to manage this sediment: (1) eroding the material to the Strait of Juan de Fuca, (2) mechanically removing the material by dredging and slurrying to either a terrestrial or saltwater site, or (3) stabilizing the sediments within the confines of the existing reservoirs.
Any of these options for implementing the Proposed Action would return gravel and help halt erosion of coastal features over time.
However, each may have different short-term impacts to both fisheries and water quality.
The erosion option would supply material to the river, but would also have a potentially adverse impact on water quality and on spawning or rearing fish through the release of fine-grained sediment (silt and clay).
The stabilization and removal options would not have these impacts to the same degree, but restoring spawning gravel would take longer.
Removing only Elwha Dam would allow the release of a relatively small amount of sediment (2 to 3 million cubic yards; or one-half to two-thirds of the total 4 million cubic yards estimated behind Elwha Dam) into a relatively short section (4.9 miles) of river.
This material would wash out to the strait and not be replenished since Lake Mills would continue to trap upstream sediment.
Removing only Glines Canyon Dam would release a larger volume (7-9 million cubic yards; or one-half to two-thirds of the total approximately 13 million cubic yards behind Glines Canyon Dam) of sediment into the middle river.
Until Lake Aldwell filled, this material would be trapped behind Elwha Dam.
However, sediment eventually would pass through the penstocks and over the spillways of Elwha Dam and flow into the lower river and nearshore marine environment.
Pg. 6 = pg. vii
Removal of both dams would positively affect native anadromous fish by returning spawning gravels throughout the lower and middle Elwha River, lowering water temperatures, and restoring fish habitat.
Returning anadromous fish would also cause changes to river water over the long term through the addition of organic material and nutrients such as phosphorus and nitrogen.
Biological productivity would increase as a result.
Water users could be affected by silt and clay for a short time, but the Elwha Restoration Act requires mitigation for adverse impacts to municipal and industrial users.
Water quality may also change over time.
Although a portion of suspended sediment now flows over the dams and downstream, removing the dams would result in a larger fraction of this finer material being transported to the middle and lower river and out to sea.
However, since elevated turbidity levels from the natural river would generally occur only during high flow periods, there would be little if any noticeable effect during low flow periods.
Releasing stored sediment behind either or both dams would also cause the riverbed to "aggrade" or rise in some places.
This would elevate river levels as well, possibly causing more frequent localized flooding.
Native Anadromous and Resident Fisheries
Resources
Currently, there are no salmon or seagoing trout in either the middle (between the dams) or upper (upstream of Lake Mills) reaches of the river because of the dams.
Installing fish passage facilities on the dams could provide native anadromous fish access to unused habitat in the Elwha.
At the same time, passage measures could harm or kill juveniles trying to reach the sea or adults moving upriver.
Juveniles would also experience increased mortality negotiating the reservoirs, even with passage measures.
Different levels of mortality due to passage for each species would be expected under different alternatives.
Sources of either Elwha native or very closely related stocks of all ten runs are available.
With in-river fishing controls and management of the species ocean harvest, nine of ten have good or excellent chances of full restoration if the dams are removed.
This is because freshwater habitat, not conditions in the marine environment, is the primary limiting factor for North Coast anadromous fish over the long term.
Elwha sockeye salmon require access to Lake Sutherland to complete their reproductive cycle.
Removing the dams would allow unobstructed access to Lake Sutherland, but stock availability may limit restoration success.
The single dam removal alternatives and the Dam Retention with mitigation (i.e., fish passage facilities) alternative all pose passage problems that cause high levels of mortality for all runs.
These would not restore habitat to the same extent as the Proposed Action.
Removing Glines Canyon Dam would restore natural transport of spawning gravel and woody debris to the middle river, but Elwha Dam would continue to block material from entering the lower river or marine environment.
The 2.8 miles of still water in Lake Aldwell and fish passage at Elwha Dam would be difficult for sockeye and chinook to navigate and virtually impossible for pink and chum.
Pg. 7 = pg. ix
Removing Elwha Dam would not restore natural transport of gravel, as Glines Canyon Dam would remain in place with approximately 2.5 miles of potentially very high quality river habitat still inundated by Lake Mills.
Navigating fish passage at Glines Canyon Dam or swimming through the reservoir during downstream juvenile migration would severely affect chinook, pink, chum, and coho.
Retaining either reservoir would also continue to inundate important spawning and rearing habitat, especially for pink and chum salmon.
Implementing the Proposed Action would eliminate passage problems posed either by the dams or the reservoirs, restore natural transport of spawning gravel and large woody debris, return 5.3 miles of inundated river to high quality pool and riffle habitat for fish, reduce elevated water temperatures and the risk of disease, and recreate the large estuary at the mouth of the river used as a fish nursery by salmon juveniles before entering their saltwater phase.
Short-term impacts to fish from the release of sediment are discussed in the "Geology, River Morphology, Hydrology 
Of the ten runs originally occupying the pre-dam Elwha River, none have good or excellent chances of restoration if either the Dam Retention or Elwha Dam Removal alternative is implemented.
Two have good chances (none have excellent) if Glines Canyon Dam Removal is selected.
Nine of ten runs have good or excellent chances of full restoration in the river if the Proposed Action is implemented.
Living Marine Resources
Removing both dams would send sand, gravel, and lesser amounts of cobble back into Freshwater Bay at the mouth of the river.
As a result, the amount of sand-gravel type habitat would increase.
The present community would change from species preferring rocky substrates (kelp, rock crabs, clingfish, gunnels, barnacles, and mussels) to those preferring a sandy substrate (eelgrass, Dungeness crab, flatfish, and hardshell clams).
Dam removal would also contribute to the restoration of the delta, estuary, and associated shellfish habitat, increasing the shellfish fishery.
In the short term, marine organisms unable to move, such as algae or shellfish, might be smothered if suspended sediments were allowed to wash out naturally.
However, nearshore currents would carry some portion of these sediments in suspension into Puget Sound where they would be diluted and have little impact.
Wildlife and Vegetation
All action alternatives would reintroduce salmon and seagoing trout to the middle and upper Elwha River.
Since many of these fish spawn and die, they would provide a source of food for a variety of birds and mammals, perhaps increasing populations of some in the Elwha River basin.
Removing either dam and draining and revegetating the reservoir lands would add terrestrial acreage.
Some of the wetlands near the reservoir shoreline may be eliminated; those that existed along the river before the dams were built would be restored.
Species such as the trumpeter swan that presently use the reservoirs would lose that habitat within the Elwha River basin.
Species such as the threatened marbled murrelet and bald eagle that depend on forest habitat and feed on salmon would benefit in time.
Pg. 8 = pg. x
Land Use, Recreation and Esthetics
Land may be needed for disposal of dam and dredge material under any of the dam removal alternatives, although ocean disposal and other uses for the rubble would be explored in the Implementation EIS.
Prior to removing either or both dams, project land (that land associated with the dams, reservoirs, and their facilities) would be acquired by the Department of the Interior.
The Elwha Restoration Act states that land acquired inside Olympic National Park boundaries will be kept by the park and managed according to park policies.
The act also dictates that acquired river banks, whether in or out of the park, will be managed according to the declared policy of Section 1(b) of the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act.
Lands outside the park may be added to the park, placed in the National Wildlife Refuge System, or held in trust for the Lower Elwha SKlallam Tribe.
The impacts of each land disposition option would be explored in the Implementation EIS if the secretary decides to remove the dams.
Hikers, campers, and anglers in the Elwha subdistrict of Olympic National Park would be temporarily kept out of the project area during fish passage construction or dam removal.
All dam removal alternatives would require some fishing restrictions to restore the native anadromous salmon and trout to their historic ranges in the Elwha River and would eventually improve fishing.
These fish would compete with and result in fewer resident trout, consistent with a natural system.
Whitewater boaters would be able to float additional sections of the river if either or both dams were removed.
If the dams were removed, reservoirs now used by flat-water boaters and anglers would be drained.
Some hikers or campers might find the drawn-down reservoirs ugly because tree stumps and barren land would be evident for a few years following dam removal.
Others might find fascination in the scene of a river returning to its natural state.
In the long term, recreationists seeking a river experience would find the Elwha attractive if the dams were removed.
Socioeconomics
Total benefits of the Proposed Action greatly exceed total costs.
Business benefits associated with recreation and tourism, including sport fishing, would total $133 million over 100 years of project life (at 3% rate of discount).
Commercial fishermen would obtain $3.5 million per year of net economic benefits after fish stocks were restored, amounting to $30 million over project life.
Approximately $1 million over the life of the project would be saved in erosion control costs at Ediz Hook, and shellfish harvest would likely be more abundant.
Removal of both dams would also substantially improve material and cultural circumstances of the Lower Elwha SKlallam Tribe.
Activity associated with removal of both dams would generate between 760 and 1,067 jobs in Clallam County, $21-29 million of personal income, and between $40 and $55 million in business activity in Clallam County over the 10-year period of river restoration activity.
A recent study also estimated restoring the river ecosystem would provide substantial non-market benefits to U.S. citizens.
Pg. 9 = pg. xi
After restoration was complete, 446 annual jobs and a payroll of $4.6 million would be generated in the Clallam County recreation and tourism sector, increasing local sales taxes by $296,000 per year.
The Dam Retention alternative would generate 37 jobs during construction, increase property tax revenue by $639,000, and generate $1.07 million in fisheries business benefits.
To install fish passage measures would cost an estimated $38 million.
Factored into the increased cost of power, the mill now using hydropower from the dams would pay an additional $196.7 million over the 100-year life of the project.
Removing Glines Canyon Dam only would provide 172 person-years employment, increase property tax revenue by $243,000, and increase fisheries benefits to $1.97 million after restoration was complete.
It would cost an estimated $86 million, including $31 million for fish passage and mitigation.
Factored into the increased cost of power (fish passage and mitigation), the mill would pay an additional $281.6 million over the 100-year life of the project.
Removing only Elwha Dam would provide 84 person-years of employment, increase tax revenues by $166,000, and increase fisheries benefits to $1.57 million after restoration was complete.
It would cost an estimated $65 million, including $25 million in fish passage and mitigation.
Factoring the cost of these required actions into the cost of replacement power, the mill would pay an additional $187.6 million over the life of the project.
The Proposed Action is estimated to cost between $75 and $101 million; this includes $29.5 million to acquire both dams (determined by Congress).
It would increase fisheries benefits to $3.5 million, and would do so more quickly than other action alternatives, as restoration would be completed without passage losses imposed by the dams and reservoirs.
The increased cost of replacement power over the 100-year life of the project would amount to $171.9 million.
Although property tax could decline by $230,000, payments to the local energy utility would increase $561,000.
Cultural Resources
Cultural resources include structures, landscapes, traditional cultural properties, archeological sites, ethnohistoric sites, and contemporary resources such as fish and cedar used for cultural purposes.
Ethnographic and ethnohistoric research shows that Elwha SKlallam settlements were located along the Elwha River and coastal portions of the project area.
Archeological research has demonstrated native occupation of the area for centuries prior to the arrival of Euro-American settlers.
Though the aboriginal SKlallam harvested a variety of plants and animals, salmon were their most important source of food, both for immediate consumption and for seasonal storage.
Restoring the salmon would restore an important traditional economic and social base for the tribe.
Non-Indian settlement of the Elwha region began in the 1860s when home sites were established in the lower part of the Elwha valley.
Homesteads were developed by both SKlallam and Euro-American settlers.
In the late 19^th and early 20^th centuries, the Elwha SKlallam continued to rely on their fisheries as the mainstay of their economy, but also made their living along with the non-Indian population by cultivating crops and orchards, raising stock and selling surplus produce and dairy products, lumber and shake mill work, packing, guiding, employment in Port Angeles and elsewhere, and providing much of the labor force to construct bridges and county roads in the vicinity.
The development and construction of the dams was a major event in the valley during the early 20^th century.
Pg. 10 = pg. xii
The tribe also has cultural properties that now lie under the reservoirs or have been made inaccessible by them.
Removing the dams could eventually uncover inundated or buried cultural resources and reestablish access to currently inaccessible sites.
The historic resources of the area include structures at the Elwha Ranger Station Historic District, a bridge, the hydroelectric projects themselves, and others.
Prior to removal, each dam would be fully inventoried, documented according to Historic American Engineering Record standards, and photographed.
If both dams were removed, a wider meandering river and higher elevation riverbed might result; mitigation for potential flooding of the Elwha Ranger Station and other historic properties would be needed.
Safety
Inspections by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission and the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers have resulted in additional strengthening and securing of the two dam structures over the years.
The Washington State Department of Ecology Office of Dam Safety indicates that both dams currently meet state safety standards for both probable maximum floods and earthquakes.
However, additional investigation of deep and shallow faults in the Port Angeles region and re-examination of earthquake safety standards are currently underway.
The results of these investigations could change the ratings of either or both dams.
If the dams were removed, the Elwha River would be resupplied with sand and gravel, elevating the riverbed and water elevation.
The river would more often overflow its banks in some places and also meander more frequently across a wider swath of the floodplain.
Some existing facilities (residences, well heads, roadways, and levees) on the outwash plain near the river mouth might need to be raised and reinforced or other mitigation employed (e.g., flood insurance) to provide the same level of flood protection as is now available.
Asbestos has been detected in the power cables, residences, and offices of the dam facilities.
One of the soil samples taken at the Glines Canyon Dam switchyard contained low levels of polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs).
Any hazardous material would be handled and disposed of in a safe manner consistent with federal regulations.
Ecosystem and Stream Ecology
Before the dams were built, native anadromous salmon and trout entered, spawned, and exited the Elwha River throughout the year.
Removing both dams would reestablish this year-round supply of food to at least 22 species of birds and mammals.
Vital nutrients released from decaying fish carcasses would also be restored, increasing the biological productivity of the entire aquatic ecosystem.
The 715 acres of terrestrial habitat, including riparian and wetland acreage, would be restored to support wildlife if the dams were removed.
In addition, 5.3 miles of high quality stream habitat inundated by the reservoirs would be returned to fish and other aquatic organisms.
Pg. 11 = pg. xiv
Removing only one dam or installing fish passage measures on the existing dams would help reestablish some fish runs and hence improve the condition of the ecosystem and stream ecology, but to a lesser extent than the Proposed Action.
Indian Trust Assets
In addition to ecological damage, the dams dramatically reduced the treaty fisheries of at least four federally recognized Indian tribesthe Lower Elwha SKlallam, the Port Gamble SKlallam, the Jamestown SKlallam, and the Makahand blocked access to treaty-reserved usual and accustomed fishing places.
These treaty-reserved interests of the four tribes to take fish as well as to access usual and accustomed fishing places are property interests subject to the federal trust responsibility which cannot be abrogated or diminished without the specific action of Congress.
This issue is discussed in various appropriate places throughout this document (water quality, fisheries, land use, etc.).
Impacts to the Indian trust assets are not discussed in a separate impact section.
The tribes have a federal reserved water right in the Elwha River in an amount necessary to propagate native anadromous fisheries and to meet the purposes of the Lower Elwha Indian Reservation (see discussion of sediment, river morphology, and water quality).
The Elwha hydropower project has operated for more than 80 years with loss of tribal access to usual and accustomed fishing places, with significant loss of both freshwater and marine fisheries resources, and with no consideration for preservation of river hydrology or morphology for the needs of the fisheries.
In general terms, removing both the Elwha and Glines Canyon dams would fully restore the Elwha River ecosystem and native fisheries, and uphold the federal trust responsibility to affected Indian tribes.
All other action alternatives would partially restore the ecosystem and native fisheries in varying degrees, but would not uphold the federal trust to affected tribes relative to the fisheries resource and access to usual and accustomed fishing places (Department of the Interior, 1994).
Pg. 15 = pg. 1
Introduction
In the early 1900s, the free-flowing Elwha River on the Olympic Peninsula in Washington State was dammed with two hydroelectric dams.
Built without fish passage facilities, they blocked the upstream migration path for all of the species of native anadromous salmon and trout that had used the river for spawning.
The dams also interrupted the downstream movement of gravel needed for spawning and, through inundation, destroyed important river salmon and trout habitat.
By 1930, the dams supplied a portion of the power needs for a pulp and paper mill in Port Angeles, Washington, currently owned by the Daishowa America Corporation.
In 1968, the owner and operator of the dams (then, Crown Zellerbach Corporation and now, James River Corporation) submitted an application to license the Elwha Dam and in 1973 an application to relicense the Glines Canyon Dam with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (commission).
Licensing was controversial and a number of parties challenged the commission's jurisdiction to relicense the Glines Canyon Dam primarily because of its location in Olympic National Park.
Before the commission could take action, it first had to comply with the National Environmental Policy Act.
In 1991, a draft environmental impact statement was published and circulated for public review (Proposed Elwha [FERC No.2683] and Glines Canyon [FERC No.588]
Comments on the draft were received and responded to by either modifying or adding information to the draft or by answering questions in the "Responses to Comment" section.
The revised draft and "Responses" section would normally have been circulated as the final environmental impact statement prior to a licensing decision, but was never released by the commission.
Congress responded to the controversy by enacting Public Law 102-495, the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act, in October 1992.
Under the act, the secretary of the interior was directed to study ways to restore the native anadromous fisheries and ecosystem of the Elwha River.
The resultant Department of the Interior study was named the "Elwha Report."
The act stayed the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission licensing process.
The Department of the Interior requested the amended environmental impact statement and responses to comments to aid in its preparation of the study.
The two volumes were retitled "Federal Energy Regulatory Commission Draft Staff Report" (Draft Staff Report).
In the Elwha Act, Congress called for the secretary of the interior to consider whether full restoration of the fisheries and ecosystem was possible only if both dams were removed and, if so, to establish a "definite plan" for removal.
In late 1993 and early 1994, the Elwha Report was reviewed by the public, finalized by Interior, and submitted to Congress.
In it, the secretary determined that removing the dams was both feasible and necessary to restore the fisheries and ecosystem and to uphold the federal trust responsibility for affected Indian tribes.
The Elwha Report examined several options for dam removal.
NEPA Issues.
While the Elwha Report reached certain conclusions about potential river restoration, further evaluation of issues, alternatives, and potential river impact was needed for the secretary of the interior to make a final decision.
A full range of alternatives to the proposed removal of both dams, and the environmental impact of each alternative, has been analyzed.
Much of this information and analyses is contained in the Draft Staff Report and the Elwha Report and their appendixes.
Pg. 16 = pg. 2
The commission's purpose in preparing an environmental impact statement was to determine whether to license the two dams.
Interior's responsibility, as defined by the Elwha Act, is to decide whether to remove the dams and fully restore the fisheries and ecosystem.
Both agencies are bound by requirements to be objective and study all reasonable alternatives, even those outside their jurisdiction.
Therefore, although the commission licenses non-federal hydropower dams and requires fish passage, its environmental impact statement examined the alternatives of removing each dam separately or removing both dams.
Likewise, although the secretary of the interior is considering removing both dams to achieve full restoration of the Elwha ecosystem and native fisheries, this environmental impact statement also examined single dam removal scenarios and the installation of fish passages on the dams.
Thus, the range of alternatives in both the commission and Interior documents is substantially the same.
Since much of the required analyses had been conducted by the commission, Interior adopted the commission's environmental impact statement (as updated and re-named Draft Staff Report in March 1993) in preparing its own environmental impact statement (40 CFR 1506.3).
Also, since the Elwha Report postdates the Draft Staff Report, Interior incorporated it and its appendixes.
Information from these two documents considered important to understand impacts is summarized in this "Elwha River Ecosystem Restoration Final Environmental Impact Statement" (final environmental impact statement).
Sections and pages of the Draft Staff Report and Elwha Report are cited so that readers can find more information.
This final environmental impact statement also contains new data and analyses not found in either of the earlier reports.
Material in this document supersedes both the Draft Staff Report and Elwha Report.
Public meetings on the draft environmental impact statement were held in Port Angeles and Seattle in November, 1994; responses to substantive comments received both at those meetings and subsequently in writing are incorporated both as text changes and appear in a question-answer format in this final environmental impact statement.
This final environmental impact statement focuses on impacts to those resources Congress requested Interior to evaluate--fisheries and the ecosystem.
By adopting the commission Draft Staff Report and incorporating the Elwha Report, this document will provide the secretary with enough information to decide whether to remove the dams.
It is therefore referred to as a "policy" or "programmatic" statement.
Since the Draft Staff Report also details a full dam removal alternative, the secretary could decide to begin removal of the dams based on this environmental impact statement.
Yet to be determined, however, are less expensive, lower impact dam removal alternatives.
To give the secretary a broad range of feasible options, Interior will write a second environmental impact statement.
If the secretary chooses dam removal as the best alternative, the second document would examine several ways to implement this decision.
It would analyze the economic and environmental costs and benefits of each, and be reviewed by the public.
The second environmental impact statement will be referred to as the "Implementation EIS" throughout this document.
Pg. 17 = pg. 3,4
For legal purposes, this final environmental impact statement cites pages of the Draft Staff Report that Interior will adopt to aid the secretary in making his decision.
All pages will be adopted except: 2-8 to 2-16 (Applicant Proposal), 2-28 to 2-44 (Cost-Benefit Analysis), 5-29 to 5-38 (FERC Staff Conclusions) and Appendix E (Cost Material).
The entire Elwha Report and its appendixes are also incorporated in this document.
A limited number of the two-volume Draft Staff Report is available from the
Denver Service Center of the National Park Service (Sarah Bransom at 303/
969-2210).
The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission documents are also
available at most public libraries and offices of the National Park Service in
Seattle or Port Angeles.
The Elwha Report is available from Dr. Brian Winter,
Elwha Project Coordinator, Olympic National Park, (360/452-0302).
Purpose and Need
Background
The 45-mile Elwha River and its tributaries were once rich in salmon and trout.
These fish were used by Native Americans for thousands of years before the first European explorers reached the Northwest Coast.
Today the Lower Elwha S'Klallam Indian Reservation, occupying 574 acres of land at the mouth of the river, is the homeland of the Lower Elwha S'Klallam Tribe, which bases much of its culture and economy on the salmon in the Elwha River.
The salmon also provide substantial commercial and recreational catches to both tribal and nontribal fishermen in the ocean approaches to the river.
The fisheries resources of the Elwha are subject to the treaty reserved interests of four Indian tribes: the Lower Elwha S'Klallam, the Port Gamble S'Klallam, the Jamestown S'Klallam, and the Makah.
In 1913, the first of two dams was completed 4.9 miles from the mouth of the river.
A second dam was built 8.5 miles farther upstream in 1926 (see Figure 2).
The Elwha Dam created a reservoir, Lake Aldwell, and the Glines Canyon Dam created a reservoir, Lake Mills.
Glines Canyon Dam is now within the boundary of Olympic National Park, its presence in conflict with park policies.
Both dams were built without fish passage facilities.
The numbers of Elwha native anadromous fish have declined drastically since the dams were built, a direct result of past and continued impacts of the dams.
The relative health of North Coast salmon stocks is erratic and depends on a combination of the conditions in the ocean and freshwater environments.
Conditions in the ocean environment tend to fluctuate over time, producing long-term cyclic changes in the size of salmon populations.
However, the ability of the freshwater environment to support fish is largely dependent upon the amount and quality of spawning and rearing habitat available.
Available high quality freshwater habitat in the North Coast area has been declining steadily over the years, with a corresponding steady decline in salmon production.
Agricultural, industrial, residential, and other land use and development such as logging send silt and pollutants into rivers.
Water diversions, development of estuaries, channeling for flood protection, and other factors eliminate stream habitat that salmon and steelhead need to successfully reproduce.
Dams and reservoirs, even those with fish passage facilities, are a primary source of mortality for both spawning adults and outmigrating juveniles.
Pg. 18 = pg. 5
On the Elwha River, the dams have completely blocked upstream passage to 93% of the salmon and steelhead spawning and rearing habitat.
Populations, primarily sustained through hatchery operations, exist in very low quality habitat in the remaining lower 4.9 miles of river.
Surface releases from the reservoirs raise temperatures 2-4 degrees C in warm summer months, a condition strongly correlated with a higher than average incidence of disease in Elwha chinook.
Redds, or spawning nests, are much more crowded than under natural conditions.
Gravel needed for spawning and large woody debris required for rearing are held back by the dams.
The river's estuary or fish "nursery," which once included one-half mile of habitat, is now confined to the first 300 feet of the river.
More than five miles of stream habitat have been inundated by the two reservoirs.
Figure 2.
Project Area
The river downstream of the dams has also changed in character since they were built.
Where the Elwha was once an active, meandering river with alternating pools and riffles ideal for fish, it now flows in a stable, armored channel.
By changing habitat downstream and barring fish from quality habitat upstream, the dams have altered the entire ecosystem of the Elwha River valley.
Terrestrial wildlife that previously fed on the salmon lost a year-round, stable supply of food.
Since decaying salmon carcasses are an important source of nitrogen and phosphorus to the aquatic food chain, their absence has altered the river ecology as well.
Unlike other dammed rivers in the northwest surrounded by development, the bulk of the Elwha River system is within the Olympic National Park and remains in a natural condition.
Because of this, the Proposed Action provides a rare opportunity to restore an entire ecosystem through the single action of removing the dams.
Congress has recognized this in passing the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act (Public Law 102-495), which mandates the study of, and a definite plan for, the removal of the dams to restore the Elwha River fisheries and ecosystem.
Congress established Olympic National Park in 1938, and expanded its boundaries in 1940, including the Glines Canyon project.
The presence and operation of the project is inconsistent with National Park Service policy to "...restore natural aquatic habitats and the natural abundance and distribution of native aquatic species, including fish, together with the associated terrestrial habitats and species" (National Park Service Management Policies, 1988).
The project also conflicts with park objectives to "...conserve, maintain, and restore, where possible, the primary natural resources of the park and those ecological relationships and processes that would prevail were it not for the advent of modern civilization" (Olympic National Park Statement for Management, 1989).
These policies and objectives are more than just local or even national concerns, since in 1976, the park was designated as an International Biosphere Reserve and in 1981 gained the distinction of being named a World Heritage Site.
Both Lake Mills and Lake Aldwell have inundated or made inaccessible sites of cultural and religious significance for the Lower Elwha S'Klallam Tribe.
The dams are also inconsistent with the federal trust responsibility to the four affected Indian tribes.
Removing the dams is the only alternative that would both uphold this trust responsibility and be consistent with stated park policies and management efforts.
It is also the only way to fully restore habitat for Elwha native anadromous fish, prevent mortality from fish passage measures and reservoirs, and return natural sediment transport and river channel conditions.
Pg. 19 = pg. 9
Purpose and Need
The Elwha and/or Glines Canyon Dams: * block native anadromous fish passage to the majority of the Elwha River and tributaries; * trap sediments and woody debris which are critical components of anadromous fish habitat and which maintain the Elwha River estuary; * limit nutrients important to the aquatic and terrestrial food chain of the Elwha River valley; * raise water temperatures, resulting in higher incidence of diseased or physiologically stressed fish; * inundate important riverine and terrestrial habitat; * inundate lands and sites of cultural and religious significance to the Lower Elwha S'Klallam Tribe; * Glines Canyon Dam is within the boundary of Olympic National Park, but in conflict with park policy to restore fisheries and aquatic habitats to their natural states; * result in beach erosion on the Elwha Reservation and east to Ediz Hook; * are inconsistent with the federal trust responsibility to four affected Indian tribes.
These are the specific problems Interior intends to resolve in following congressional mandate to "...fully restore the Elwha River ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries..." consistent with the rights of Indian tribes secured by treaty or other federal law as stated in the Elwha Restoration Act (PL 102-495).
Removing both dams will alleviate each of the above conditions, either completely or to a very large degree.
Therefore, Interior finds there is a need to accomplish the congressional and agency purpose of full restoration of the Elwha River ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries through its proposed action of removing both the Elwha 
The specific Department of Interior objectives are:
1.
Fully restore all runs of Elwha River native anadromous fish
2.
Restore the Elwha River ecosystem
Congress has directed Interior to determine the feasibility of dam removal scenarios, protect downstream water quality for municipal and industrial users, and evaluate options for the disposition of acquired lands outside park boundaries should the dams be removed.
Specific alternatives for each can be found in the Elwha Report: for dam removal, pp.65 to 90; for protecting water quality for municipal and industrial users, pp.91 to 100; for disposition of lands, pp.117 to 120.
All are considered technically feasible by Interior.
Preliminary cost estimates for dam removal and water quality protection for municipal and industrial users are presented in the Elwha Report and refined in this EIS.
These issues, plus the treatment of specific associated dam structures, would be examined in more detail in the Implementation EIS.
Description of the Alternatives
This chapter will describe each of the five alternatives that Interior has analyzed and summarize both the impacts and the degree to which each accomplishes the Interior objectives, identical to congressional mandates, first identified in the "Purpose and Need" chapter.
Pg. 20 = pg. 11
The Elwha Dam, built 4.9 miles from the mouth of the Elwha River, began operation in 1913.
The concrete structure, consisting of a central gravity-type section with an adjacent buttress-type intake section flanked by spillways at each abutment, is 450 feet long at its crest and 105 feet high.
Lake Aldwell, the 2.8 mile impoundment created by the dam, has a total storage capacity of approximately 8,100 acre-feet.
The total installed power generation capacity of the dam is 12.6 megawatts.
The Elwha Dam has never been licensed.
Glines Canyon Dam, located 8.5 miles farther upstream, began operation in 1927.
It is a varied radius, single-arch concrete dam 210 feet high, varying in width from 55 feet at its base to 270 feet at its crest.
The 2.5-mile Lake Mills reservoir provides approximately 30,000 acre-feet of active storage, with drawdowns up to 4,000 acre-feet during extreme low flows.
The total installed capacity is 16.0 megawatts.
The Glines Canyon Dam has operated under an annually renewed federal license since 1976.
Description of the Alternatives
Proposed Action
Removing both Elwha and Glines Canyon dams would require the acquisition and decommissioning of the two projects, draining the reservoirs, and removing all or parts of the dams, powerhouses, and auxiliary structures.
As required by the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act, the quality and availability of downstream municipal and industrial water supplies would be protected.
Specific steps to remove the dams (described in detail in the Elwha Report, pp.70-90) include diverting the river through or around the dams to drain the reservoirs; decommissioning and removing all structures necessary for safety or for fish passage; and draining the reservoirs and managing the 17 million cubic yards of sediments that have accumulated behind the dams for the past 80 years.
Several scenarios to manage sediment and divert the river were investigated in the Elwha Report.
The river could be routed by way of a tunnel, surface diversion channel, low level diversion through the dam structure, or by notching the dam down from the top.
Sediment could be transported naturally by the river, stabilized on site, or dredged and moved (probably by slurry pipeline) off site.
Some historically important structures could be left in place.
Some of these options were investigated in the Elwha Report.
Many of these, as well as other alternatives, would be further explored in the Implementation EIS if the Proposed Action is selected by the secretary of the interior.
The Implementation EIS also would address specific fisheries and ecosystem restoration, protection of the quality and availability of existing water supplies, flood control, and disposition of acquired lands.
If the Department of the Interior acquires the dams, interim management consistent with policy direction in the Elwha Restoration Act might be required while the Implementation EIS or other planning is underway.
Interior could begin its native anadromous fisheries restoration efforts by planting some species in the middle and upper river while the dams were still in place.
To accommodate juvenile downstream migration of these species, turbines or turbine runners may need to be removed at both dams.
Pg. 21 = pg. 12
At Glines Canyon Dam, initial reservoir drawdown would include the use of the spillway and penstock.
Releases through the penstock would be limited, and passage for any outplanted anadromous fish hazardous if the turbines remain.
To accommodate both drawdown and fish passage, the turbines may be removed and a large control gate installed.
This alternative may require the construction of an energy dissipator to prevent severe channel erosion downstream of the control gate (due to larger flows).
Two options have been considered for locating the large control gate: one is to install it within the power plant where the turbine formerly had been located; the other is to install it at the end of a steel bypass pipe branching off the penstock outside of the power plant.
In the latter case, the control gate and an energy dissipator would be installed near the power plant on land that has been disturbed and lies outside the river channel.
Typical construction vehicles required for this work would include a mobile crane, a front end loader, flatbed trucks, and concrete mixers.
These vehicles would use existing roads and the parking lot as a staging area.
All standard practices to ensure that fuel or leaks were contained would be followed.
At Elwha Dam, initial reservoir drawdown would include the use of both spillways and penstocks.
The turbine of the larger penstock could be removed to provide additional release capacity and provide improved passage for outplanted salmon and trout.
A control gate would not be required, as flow can be controlled to a great extent by the use of the spillways on both the left and right abutments.
If turbines were removed, they could be cut up and sold for salvage value.
The environmental impacts of removing the turbines would be minor--temporary impacts to air quality from construction vehicles and ground disturbance associated with the bypass around the Glines powerhouse.
Oil or fuel used on site to construct the bypass or energy dissipator, should they be required, would be physically prevented from entering the river by berms or other means.
Removing the turbines would also mean the loss of an average 18.7 megawatts of power the hydroelectric plants now produce.
Costs of replacement power are analyzed in the socioeconomic section of this document, and the possible environmental impacts of different sources of replacement power in the Draft Staff Report (pp 4-213 to 215) and Elwha Report (pp 128-129).
No Action Alternative
Review of this alternative provides an analysis of existing conditions against which to compare all action alternatives.
For the purposes of this environmental impact statement, No Action means that Interior would take "no action;" the two dams, powerhouses, reservoirs, and auxiliary structures would remain as now, without fish passage or other mitigation.
The No Action alternative described here (as opposed to No Action = No Dams) is used because it provides a context or yardstick against which to compare impacts of proposed actions.
The implementing regulations of the National Environmental Policy Act also ask agencies to consider possible ensuing actions if No Action is the selected alternative.
The Department of the Interior legally challenged the authority of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission in relicensing the Glines Canyon hydroelectric project within Olympic National Park before Congress passed the Elwha Restoration Act.
This and other litigation may result if this alternative is selected and the commission resumes the relicensing process.
Pg. 22 = pg. 13
Dam Retention Alternative
To achieve fullest possible restoration, Interior has added mitigation measures to those proposed by the commission to better pass fish over the dams.
These measures, described in detail on pp. 29-31 of the Elwha Report, are summarized here.
This alternative is very similar to that described as "Applicant's Proposal with Supplemental Measures" in the Draft Staff Report.
Elwha Dam would be fitted with a fish ladder, ladder entrance, holding and sorting pools, and an inclined bar rack at the powerhouse tail race exit portals to prevent fish entry into the draft tubes where the adults could be delayed or injured while migrating upstream.
To convey juveniles downstream, all water would be passed through modified spillways and screens would be installed on intake structures.
A bypass pipe and vertical traveling screen facility, an open channel flume, and a concrete pool and weir structure would be built.
A trap-and-haul operation to convey fish past the 190-foot vertical lift at Glines Canyon Dam would be used to transport adults upstream.
This system would include an electric weir to direct fish into the traps, holding and sorting pools, and a hoist to load fish onto a transport truck as well as other features (Elwha Report, p. 30).
A year-round release of 450 cubic feet per second would flow over the Glines Canyon Dam spillway to help pass juveniles, and a screened or relocated intake for the power plant would be installed.
The year-round release and the screened or relocated intake are additional mitigation not described in the Draft Staff Report, but required by Interior.
In addition to fish protection, this alternative includes the enhancement of 898 acres of applicant (James River Corporation) property outside Olympic National Park for wildlife benefits and the construction of three remote boat-in campsites on the east side of Lake Aldwell.
Removal of Glines Canyon Dam Alternative
Glines Canyon Dam would be decommissioned, the reservoir drained and features of the dam, powerhouse, and auxiliary structures necessary for safety and for fish passage removed.
The mitigation measures described in the Dam Retention scenario for Elwha Dam would be installed.
Sediment management and river diversion options, as well as land disposal, fish restoration, and water quality mitigation measures for this alternative would be further examined in the Implementation EIS if the secretary chooses this option.
Removal of Elwha Dam Alternative
Features of the Elwha Dam project would be removed as necessary for safety or fish passage as described above, and the trap-and-haul and other mitigation measures for fish would be installed at Glines Canyon Dam.
Sediment management and river diversion options, as well as land disposal, fish restoration, and water quality mitigation measures for this alternative would be further examined in the Implementation EIS if the secretary chooses this option.
Pg. 23 = pg. 14
Alternatives Considered But Rejected
Several of the alternatives described in the Elwha Report (pp 78-89) would have relied on truck transportation of coarse sediment to a terrestrial site.
These include options #1 and 2, estimated to cost between $200 million and $300 million.
Interior has rejected truck transportation of sediment to a disposal site because it has no environmental advantage over the less expensive option of slurrying sediment via a pipeline.
Also, the concept of transporting and storing fine sediments away from the river at a terrestrial location has been eliminated as technically and economically infeasible.
Such an alternative would require a large amount of land--more than 200 acres if sediment is stored 20 feet high.
Since the sediments would be watery, it would take extensive erosion control measures to keep the silt and clay from returning to the river.
The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission rejected land disposal of fine sediment away from the river as economically infeasible for these reasons.
Interior, upon re-examination of the commission's analysis (not included in, but prepared in conjunction with the Draft Staff Report) agreed.
If fine sediments are disposed of on land, the technically and economically preferred option would be within the drained reservoir lands and out of the floodplain.
This is referred to as the stabilization alternative in this environmental impact statement.
Finally, several alternatives were suggested by commentors on the draft of this statement.
Interior has considered the merits of each, and would examine several further in the Implementation EIS if appropriate.
Several were rejected as infeasible.
See the Response to Comments section of this document, "Alternatives" questions for more information.
Meeting Department of the Interior Objectives
In the "Purpose and Need" chapter, the congressional mandates spelled out in the Elwha Restoration Act, and hence Interior's objectives in taking action at this time, were first introduced.
Here, each alternative is evaluated against these criteria to see how well it performs.
The objectives are:
1.
Fully restore all runs of Elwha River native anadromous fish.
2.
Restore the Elwha River ecosystem.
In general terms, only by removing both the Elwha and Glines Canyon dams would the Elwha River ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries be fully restored.
Other action alternatives would partially restore the ecosystem and fisheries to varying degrees.
The following is a summary of how effectively each alternative meets the specific objectives:
Objective #1.
Fully Restore All Runs of Elwha River
Native Anadromous Fish
Very few runs of native anadromous salmon and trout would be restored to the Elwha unless both dams were removed.
Only winter and summer steelhead have a "good" chance for restoration in any of the partial restoration alternatives.
All others have "fair," "poor," or "no chance" of restoration.
If both dams were retained without mitigation (No Action), self-sustaining runs of salmon would never be restored to the river.
Pg. 24 = pg. 15
No Action (current conditions)
Elwha River anadromous salmon and steelhead exist in only 7% of their pre-dam freshwater habitat, as construction of the Elwha Dam eliminated access to 93% of the historical habitat.
Spawning gravel and woody debris, both required for successful spawning and rearing, are largely or completely absent in these 4.9 miles of available river.
More than five miles of quality freshwater fish habitat are inundated by the two reservoirs.
Upstream releases of reservoir water elevate stream temperatures as much as 4^o C in warm months, a condition strongly associated with higher than average incidence of disease in chinook.
Chinook redds, or spawning nests, are five times more crowded than under natural conditions, and populations are maintained only through hatchery production.
If both dams were retained without fish passage, self-sustaining runs of wild salmon or steelhead would never be restored on the Elwha.
Continuing the present course would particularly hurt the Lower Elwha S'Klallam Tribe, since many of its members are unemployed or economically depressed and depend on the fisheries for food and income.
Dam Retention
If mitigation as described in the "Alternatives" chapter of this document is added, three runs might be partially restored in the long term: coho salmon and the winter and summer steelhead.
However, none has even a "good" chance for full restoration.
Partial restoration would include (as do all alternatives) phasing out hatchery production and enforcing fishing restrictions in the short term.
Although populations of wild coho and steelhead would be dispersed throughout the river's length in greater numbers than today, the total number of anadromous fish in the river would decline.
The seven other runs of salmon and trout have poor or unknown chances of restoration if both dams were retained and mitigated with fish passage measures.
This would be a result of unavoidable passage losses, inundated riverine habitat, and poor habitat quality between and below the dams.
Removal of Glines Canyon Dam
If the Glines Canyon Dam were removed, chances of restoring steelhead, coho, and chinook would be higher than in the Dam Retention alternative.
The chances of fully restoring both winter and summer steelhead are considered good, but this is not true for any other runs.
Since these species are commercially valuable, this alternative would be economically beneficial, but to a far lesser degree than if both dams were removed.
Removing this dam would provide passage to the upper river; recreate 2.5 miles of riverine habitat now inundated; reduce artificially high water temperatures; restore gravel, nutrients, and organic debris needed in the middle stretch of the river; and remove Lake Mills, a serious barrier to juvenile outmigration for some species.
Fish such as pink and chum salmon, unable to survive passage through Lake Aldwell, would fare poorly even if Glines Canyon Dam were removed.
Passage success for cutthroat and native char is unknown.
Approximately 2.8 miles of river habitat for fish would continue to be inundated by Lake Aldwell.
Pg. 25 = pg. 17
Removal of Elwha Dam
Since the Removal of Elwha Dam would leave Glines Canyon Dam in place, chinook, coho and steelhead would not fare as well under this alternative as the Glines Canyon Dam Removal alternative.
On the other hand, since passage over the mitigated Elwha Dam is unlikely for pink, chum, and sockeye salmon, these species would be expected to have a better chance for restoration if Elwha Dam were removed than if Glines Canyon Dam were taken out.
Economic benefit from fisheries would be about equal to the Glines Canyon Dam Removal scenario, but again, to a lesser degree than if both dams were removed.
If Elwha Dam were removed, Glines Canyon Dam would continue to block nutrients, spawning gravels, and woody debris from the majority of the watershed and affect water temperature.
It would also present major passage problems for species unable to migrate through the still waters of the reservoir (many use the stream current to move downstream) or withstand losses from the spillway or trap-and-haul process.
Lake Mills would continue to inundate 2.5 miles of river habitat for fish.
Proposed Action
Removing both dams would allow native anadromous fish to spawn upstream and allow nutrients, sediment, and debris to flow unobstructed downstream into currently impoverished parts of the river.
River temperatures would return to normal, and more than five miles of high quality freshwater anadromous fish habitat would be restored.
Removing the dams would immediately restore the 93% of the freshwater anadromous fish habitat lost when the Elwha Dam was built.
A source of native Elwha River or closely related stock is available for all 10 runs, and agency and tribal-enforced fishing restrictions are in place.
With the exception of sockeye salmon, all species have a good to excellent chance of full restoration if both dams are removed.
Sockeye stand a fair or poor chance of restoration.
The four affected Indian tribes and Clallam County businesses would benefit economically and culturally from the full return of the native anadromous fishery.
It is estimated that this alternative would restore at least four times as many wild salmon and trout to the Elwha as the single dam removal alternatives.
Objective #2.
Restore the Elwha River Ecosystem
An ecosystem is composed of physical and biological pieces mutually dependent upon or interactive with one another.
Fully restoring an ecosystem means all are balanced, healthy, and functioning naturally.
In the Elwha River basin, the role of the ten runs of salmon and trout that occupied the river before the dams were built is critical to ecosystem restoration.
These fish brought nutrients from the sea, in the form of biomass or body weight, which they spread throughout the river as they migrated.
Their eggs and especially their carcasses supplied food to an abundance of birds and mammals along the river.
Just as the fish carcasses supported the terrestrial wildlife, nutrients from decomposing carcasses were the base of an aquatic food cycle which eventually fed the juvenile salmon themselves.
Pg. 26 = pg. 18
As a result of competition for spawning sites, food, and limited rearing habitat, salmon and trout evolved staggered timetables; adults of different species enter and spawn and juveniles leave the river at different times of the year.
The terrestrial and aquatic ecosystems were provided food and nutrients throughout the year, even when other food was scarce.
No alternative except full dam removal would reestablish this pre-dam species distribution, or provide terrestrial and aquatic life with the nutrients they need to fully use other features of the natural habitat within Olympic National Park.
No Action
Native anadromous salmon and trout now never reach beyond the Elwha Dam or first 4.9 miles of the Elwha River.
Fish produced by hatcheries return to crowded, poor quality stream conditions to spawn, where they are subject to physiological stress, disease, high water temperatures, and inadequate spawning or rearing habitat.
Since adults are collected to maintain hatchery production, even fewer salmon carcasses, eggs, and juveniles are available to wildlife in the lower river.
Birds and mammals in the middle and upper river completely lack the prey resource these fish once provided, and riparian and upland habitat once available to them is now degraded or inundated.
The river channel and flow characteristics are also altered by the dams.
Before the dams were built, much of the middle river (between the dams) was an active, meandering channel with sand, gravel, and cobble bars.
The riverbed was composed of sand, gravel, cobbles, and boulders, with most of the finer grained material (silt and clay) washing through the system (FERC, p.3-l1).
The sand and gravel would move during higher flows, preventing permanent vegetation from taking hold on in-river sediment bars.
Since the dams were built, sand and gravel in both the lower and middle reaches of the rivers have become trapped in the reservoirs.
Bedload is now composed primarily of cobbles and boulders that rarely move.
The river meanders less and the channel has become more stabilized and less active.
In some places, the channel has degraded (lowered) as much as 1 to 5 feet.
In the absence of moving pulses of sand and gravel, "islands" of sediment have become vegetated, some with mature trees.
The estuary at the mouth of the river, used by all juvenile native anadromous fish during transition from fresh water to salt water, is also affected by the dams.
It has decreased by approximately one-half mile from its pre-dam size, is deeper, and consists mostly of larger cobbles and boulders.
In addition, the beaches and nearshore area east to Ediz Hook are sediment starved and eroding.
Dam Retention
Although mitigation measures would allow some fish to pass over the dams and swim upstream, impacts to the ecosystem would largely remain.
Water temperature related distress, disease, and fish mortality would persist.
The flow of the river would remain unnaturally modified, sediments would not reach the middle or lower Elwha or the estuary at its mouth, beaches east to Ediz Hook would remain sediment-starved, and river and upland habitat would remain flooded by the reservoirs.
Some wild anadromous fish would reach wildlife in the upper Elwha that use them for food, but far fewer fish (due to passage mortality, fewer fish runs, and inundated habitat) would be available than under pre-dam conditions, and their migrations would be clustered into certain seasons rather than dispersed throughout the year.
Pg. 27 = pg. 20
Removal of Glines Canyon Dam
Glines Canyon Dam is located within the boundary of Olympic National Park.
Its impacts are in direct conflict with park policy to "conserve, maintain, and restore, where possible, the primary natural resources of the park and those ecological relationships and processes that would prevail were it not for the advent of modern civilization," (Statement for Management, 1989).
Dam removal would eliminate the obvious presence of modern civilization and restore natural ecological processes to the Elwha River valley to some extent within park boundaries.
The river would, however, continue to be negatively affected by the Elwha Dam.
Because it presents passage problems for the native anadromous fish, wildlife and the aquatic ecosystem would be denied more than 500,000 pounds of fish biomass during critical times of the year (Elwha Report, p.36).
In addition, Lake Aldwell would continue to inundate important riverine and terrestrial habitat and affect quality in the lower river by elevating water temperature during late summer and fall.
Stream flow regime and transport of nutrients, gravels, and debris would resume, but only as far as Elwha Dam, to be blocked until Lake Aldwell filled with sediment and began to flow through the penstocks and spillways.
This would not result in natural, pre-dam conditions, however, as sediment stored in Lake Aldwell and its delta would remain permanently.
Although some fish would pass the Elwha Dam and be reintroduced into the middle and upper Elwha, species would not distribute themselves throughout the year and might not be available during critical wildlife feeding periods.
Nor would they provide the year-round fishery that the Lower Elwha S'Klallam Tribe historically relied upon.
Removal of Elwha Dam
This alternative adds approximately 27,000 pounds of sockeye biomass (Elwha Report, p.36) to the projected total for the Removal of Glines Canyon Dam alternative.
Poor habitat in the middle and lower would preclude full restoration of any other anadromous fish species.
Species distribution of salmon and anadromous trout would not approximate pre-dam conditions.
Stream flow and river channel characteristics would remain modified by the presence of Glines Canyon Dam.
The estuary and beaches east to Ediz Hook would remain sediment starved.
Salmon and anadromous trout would not be distributed along the river corridor throughout the year, depriving wildlife and tribal fishermen of a resource they historically relied upon.
Proposed Action
Only this alternative would fully restore the Elwha River Valley ecosystem since it restores all of the natural biological and physical processes of the river.
Removing the dams would restore important riverine and terrestrial habitat now inundated or made inaccessible by the reservoirs and recreate natural species distribution and abundance of native anadromous fish.
With both dams removed, barriers are removed for fish migrating upstream and nutrients flowing downstream.
Water temperatures would return to normal.
Approximately 800,000 pounds of fish biomass would return to the middle and upper Elwha River and, with it, 13,000 pounds of recycled nitrogen and phosphorus in the form of decaying carcasses (Elwha Report, p. 36).
These nutrients would help support the aquatic food chain, and the fish themselves feed an abundance of wildlife.
Since nine of the ten runs have good or excellent chances of full restoration, the river would be filled with salmon or trout all year, providing a necessary food source for some wildlife, especially during the critical late fall and winter months.
With no dams, the stream flow would return to its normal, dynamic state--naturally moving sand and gravel downstream, flooding, changing course, undercutting riverbanks, and filling the bed with coarse sediment as storms wash material from upstream.
The estuary would be restored and the process of beach erosion would be reversed.
The chart below summarizes impacts of each alternative so that readers may evaluate their comparative merits.
This information is from the "Impacts of Each Alternative" chapter.
Table 1.
Impact Summary Chart
ALTERNATIVES
No Action
Dam Retention
Glines Canyon Dam Removal
Elwha Dam Removal
Proposed Action
FLUVIAL PROCESSES Channel morphology Static Static Middle section dynamic Static Entire river dynamic Aggradation None None 1-5 ft. between reservoirs short term, entire river after 50 years if Lake Aldwell fills* Temporary 1-5 ft., (pre-project conditions)* Sediment 
Of salmon/trout) 0 109 284 312 818 Nitrogen 
* Preliminary estimate only
** From recent estimates in Meyer, et. al., 1995 and U.S. Bureau of Reclamation, 1995
*** Ongoing research to both assess the hazard from newly discovered faults in the area and revise earthquake safety standards may require re-evaluation of the safety of the dams Pg. 28-33 = pg. 22-27
Impacts of Each Alternative
This chapter will first present a description of existing environmental conditions for each resource (sediment, water quality, etc.), and, second, a discussion of impacts expected to the resource if the alternatives were to be implemented.
The existing conditions are termed "Affected Environment."
Sediment, River Morphology and Water Quality
Affected Environment
The Elwha River is 45 miles long, has 100 miles of tributary streams, and drains 321 square miles of the Olympic Peninsula (See Figure 3).
Eighty-three percent of the drainage lies within Olympic National Park, comprising approximately 20% of the total park area.
Impoundment of the river in Lake Mills and Lake Aldwell has inundated 5.3 miles of riverine and 715 acres of lowland habitat.
Annual precipitation in the Elwha River basin ranges from 220 inches in its upper reaches to 56 inches near the mouth of the river.
Average annual daily discharge is 1500 cubic feet per second.
Discharge is influenced by early winter storms and spring snowmelt, and by baseflow conditions during the summer.
The lowest flow period is during late summer and early fall.
The Elwha River, its tributaries, and Lake Mills and Lake Aldwell are classified by the Washington Department of Ecology as Class AA waters, signifying "extraordinary" quality.
Overall, the Elwha has relatively low concentrations of dissolved and suspended sediment loads, nutrients, and organics.
Changes in natural water quality occur in the lower part of the watershed, mostly as a result of reduced sediment load and elevated water temperatures during the summer.
Suspended sediment concentrations and turbidity of the lower river are related to flood flows, logging, agricultural practices, and bank erosion.
The city of Port Angeles holds 200 of the 206 cubic feet per second of state-issued water rights on the Elwha River; a 50 cubic feet per second groundwater right for municipal purposes at a Ranney well next to the river; and a 150 cubic feet per second surface right covering a diversion structure and canal approximately 3 miles upstream from the river mouth.
This surface diversion provides water to three industrial users, two large paper and pulp mills, and the Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife fish rearing channel.
Private landowners and the Lower Elwha S'Klallam Tribe hold rights to the other 6 cubic feet per second.
The United States holds additional water rights in trust for the tribe that are not issued by or registered with the state.
Pg. 34 = pg. 27
These rights protect sufficient water to support treaty fisheries and the purposes of the Lower Elwha Indian Reservation.
Sediments in the Elwha River drainage basin are dominated by glacial deposits and recent alluvium.
These sediments, developed in the last 8,000 years as glacial deposits, range in size from clay to cobble and provide much of the material transported by the Elwha.
Upstream from Lake Mills, the riverbed material consists of sand, gravel, cobbles, boulders, and, in some places, bedrock outcrops.
Downstream from both dams, the volume of sand and gravel is much reduced.
The Elwha River has a steep slope--steepest at the headwaters (16% average gradient) and generally decreasing in the downstream direction.
The river flows through several steep, narrow, bedrock canyons.
Between these canyons, the channel is more mildly sloping and has wider reaches with floodplains.
Near the mouth, the river has the widest floodplain and the flattest slope.
The sometimes high and variable sediment loads carried by the upper Elwha make this natural reach dynamic, with bank erosion, channel migration, and gravel and cobble bars that erode and are later re-formed.
Although the river below the dams was once the same, the greatly reduced coarse sediment load has changed the formerly dynamic lower reach to one that is static, with stable gravel bars and mature, woody vegetation established in the floodplains.
Near what is now Lake Mills, the pre-dam river gradient was less steep than immediately up- or downstream.
In this natural bottom or flatter area, the Elwha River was a meandering and locally braided channel with gravel and cobble bars.
These bars were maintained with high sediment input from upstream and from erosion of the surrounding floodplain and valley walls.
Sand and gravel are currently trapped by Lake Mills and the riverbed in the middle stretch has become armored with only larger cobbles and boulders.
Without the natural upstream sediment supply, local channel migration has decreased and many floodplains have become well vegetated.
Conditions are similar in the first two miles below Elwha Dam.
Below these two miles, the river flows out into a wide, wooded floodplain with soils of sands, silts, and cobbles.
This floodplain is bound on the west side by steep cliffs more than 150 feet high.
Here, the pre-dam river channel migrated throughout its entire floodplain, 1.2 miles wide near the mouth of the river, preventing the establishment of mature evergreen forest.
Currently, channel migration near the mouth is constrained by dense, woody vegetation in the floodplain and on the east by a setback levee constructed in 1989.
This levee is located beyond the limits of the current meander-belt width (based on empirical relationships and historical evidence from aerial photographs); however, it is not considered structurally capable of constraining channel migration if that meander belt is widened, as it may be if the dams were removed (U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, 1994).
A 600-foot-long levee that extends downstream from the high river bluffs on the west side of the river near its mouth also restricts the floodplain.
It may be necessary to modify (i.e., strengthen) these levees if the dams are removed.
Figure 3.
Elwha River System
Erosion and river transport for 9,000 years delivered an estimated 280,000 cubic yards of sediment annually to form an extensive delta at the river mouth before the Elwha Dam was completed in 1914.
Currently, the only sources of delta sediment are those in the three miles upstream from the mouth, i.e., erosion of loose material (alluvium) and of the bluffs that lie along the west side of the river.
As a result, sediment yields to the delta have dropped to 5,900 cubic yards per year, or approximately 2% of the pre-dam volume, and the beaches east of the river mouth have eroded substantially (75-150 feet of shoreline recession, FERC, p.3-19).
Pg. 35 = pg. 28
Material from the historic Elwha delta helped to create and feed Ediz Hook, an above-surface extension of sand, gravel, and cobbles that forms the bayward side of Port Angeles Harbor (FERC, p.3-20).
It has also nourished beaches and nearshore areas.
The drastic reduction in supply from the river has caused some erosion of both beaches and the western edge of Ediz Hook.
The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, which spends approximately $100,000 annually to control further erosion of Ediz Hook (U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, Jan.1995), estimates contribution from the river before the dams were built to have been between 50,000 and 80,000 cubic yards per year.
Currently, the river contributes a negligible volume of sediment to the Hook.
A set of marine cliffs east of the river mouth also helped form and sustain Ediz Hook, but this source, too, has been vastly reduced.
In 1930 and again in 1958, the cliffs were stabilized to control erosion and protect the city's water supply line at their base.
Based on updated information, the Army Corps now believes the dams have reduced sediment to the coastal area from the Elwha River mouth to Ediz Hook by 35%, and stabilization of the marine cliffs by 55% (US Army Corps of Engineers, personal communication, 1995).
Impacts
The dams and reservoirs have altered and continue to alter the character of the river; these impacts are the impacts of the No Action alternative.
The morphology of the Elwha River has been modified by the presence of Lake Mills and Lake Aldwell.
The meandering and braided channels that existed prior to the dams have been downcut and are armored.
Dam construction has resulted in trapping of sediment, large woody debris, and nutrients in the reservoirs; inundation of native anadromous fish habitat; and alteration of aquatic habitats downstream from the dams.
The marine nearshore is also different as a result of the dams (see Living Marine Resources).
Deposits in the intertidal and shallow subtidal zone are now primarily cobble instead of sand.
Although a portion of the fine sediment (clays and silts) has escaped the dams and been transported downstream, the dams have retained larger sized sediment, and much less sand and gravel exists in the lower and middle reaches than before the dams were built.
As a result, the riverbed may be as much as 1 to 5 feet lower than under pre-dam conditions (FERC, p.4-2) and is composed primarily of cobbles and boulders which move only during very high flood events.
River elevation has also dropped and, as a result, is more often contained within its channel during moderate flow conditions.
Pg. 36 = pg. 31
As of 1994, the volume of sediment trapped behind Glines Canyon Dam was estimated to be 13 million cubic yards (J. Gilbert and R. Link, U.S. Bureau of Reclamation, personal communication, March 1995).
If averaged over the years since it was completed (1927 to 1994), approximately 190,000 cubic yards per year has been trapped in the reservoir.
It is unlikely that uniform transport of material has been the annual norm since there is evidence of upstream landslides during this same period.
All of the coarser grained gravel, sand, cobbles, and boulders and a portion of the finer clays and silt have settled in or immediately upstream of the reservoirs.
In Lake Mills, silt and clay deposits have an average thickness of 12 feet.
The delta at the upper end of the lake consists primarily of sand and gravel (with smaller amounts of clay, silt, and boulders) and is as much as 70 feet thick (FERC, p.3-l1).
The volume of sediment trapped in Lake Aldwell and its delta is estimated to be 4 million cubic yards (Gilbert and Link, personal communication, 1995).
Approximately one-half of these deposits were trapped in the reservoir prior to construction of the Glines Canyon Dam.
The No Action alternative would continue to impact water quality in the river by trapping nutrients and organic material and by raising temperatures through surface releases of reservoir water.
Because a large portion of the finer grained sediment (clay and fine silt) remains suspended, the river is turbid during high flows regardless of the dams.
Water temperatures in the middle and lower river would continue to be elevated 2 to 4 degrees C during late summer and early fall (FERC, p.3-24).
Warmer temperatures in the middle and lower portions of the river have been linked to the occurrence of Dermocystidium salmonis, a disease that has caused increased mortality in the lower Elwha population of chinook salmon.
River flow rate downstream of the dams is very similar to that naturally occurring (i.e., before the dams) since the dams are almost always operated in a "run-of-the-river" mode.
Thus, the reservoirs reduce the effects of only the shortest duration and most minor floods.
Otherwise, the rate that water enters and exits the reservoirs at any given time is roughly the same.
Although some additional sediment would be introduced into the middle and lower Elwha River during construction of fish passage measures, the long-term impacts of the Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternative on sediment transport and water quality would otherwise be identical to those described for the No Action alternative.
If only Glines Canyon Dam were removed, 7 to 9 million cubic yards of sediment (one-half to two-thirds of the total) would be expected to naturally erode.
The majority of finer grained sediment (silt and clay) would wash out within the first six months following dam removal.
Although some would settle in Lake Aldwell, most fine sediment would stay in suspension and flow out to the lower river and into the marine environment.
The larger-sized material would wash into the middle river and settle in Lake Aldwell and its delta.
If sediment was released from Lake Mills, the resulting sedimentation in Lake Aldwell would reduce that lake's capacity by 40 to 60%.
Restoration of the natural sediment transport regime would result in the filling of the remaining reservoir capacity within an estimated 40-50 years.
Pg. 37 = pg. 32
Since the intake for water to the powerhouse is located near the surface of Lake Aldwell, the power plant would theoretically remain operative until nearly the entire reservoir was filled.
However, larger-sized sediment such as sand would begin to pass through the penstocks, dulling and ultimately destroying the turbine runners.
Although it would be possible to routinely replace runners as they were destroyed, the cost of doing so would probably prohibit the ongoing operation of the Elwha power plant.
In the long run, sediment could flow through the spillway and penstocks and into the lower river and marine environment.
Under the Removal of Elwha Dam alternative, 2 to 3 million cubic yards of sediment (one-half to two-thirds of the total) would be expected to wash into the lower river and coastal zone if naturally eroded.
This volume would be washed away within one to ten years.
Since Glines Canyon Dam would remain in place, normal sediment transport would not be reestablished in the middle or lower river.
If the Proposed Action were implemented, the natural transport of sediment from upper to lower river would be restored regardless of the type of sediment management selected.
However, the volume of material entering the river and/or marine environment in the short term would vary depending on the method of sediment management.
This environmental impact statement presumes sediment would be naturally eroded under each of the single dam removal alternatives.
A full spectrum of sediment management options, including natural erosion, mechanical removal via a slurry pipeline, and stabilization of sediments in place in the reservoir area, are possible means of implementing the Proposed Action.
The feasibility of several of these options was analyzed in the Elwha Report.
Allowing all sediment behind the dams to wash out naturally would result in the largest amount of sediment in the river in the short term.
Although it depends heavily on the degree of mitigation needed to protect industrial and municipal water supplies, at this time, it also appears to be the lowest cost option (Elwha Report, pp 140-141, as updated by Bureau of Reclamation, 1995).
Mechanically removing sediment or stabilizing it on site before the dams are removed could be the most costly (Elwha Report, pp.138-139, as updated by BOR, 1995) but potentially result in the smallest amount of sediment entering the river in the short term.
Combinations of these approaches are possible and some would be analyzed in the Implementation EIS.
If both dams were removed, up to 9 to 12 million cubic yards of sediment (one-half to two-thirds of the total) could be introduced into the river system.
The Proposed Action is the only alternative which would return near-natural (a city diversion structure near the mouth of the river may remain) sediment transport conditions to the Elwha River.
Following removal of both dams and revegetation of the reservoir area, channel activities and substrate conditions would eventually return to pre-dam conditions (see "Affected Environment").
Increased sediment to the coastal areas would create shoals and bars, and supply sediment to the river delta, Angeles Point, and Ediz Hook.
Over time, some or all of these features would be partially or fully restored (FERC, p. 4-93).
Aggradation, or the degree to which the riverbed rises, differs with each alternative.
No Action or Dam Retention (with mitigation) would continue to deny sediment to the middle and lower river, with the riverbed remaining artificially lowered and armored.
If either Removal of Glines Canyon Dam or the Proposed Action were selected, preliminary estimates suggest the riverbed and river elevation could rise 1 to 5 feet in some places, potentially causing more frequent localized flooding and/or a wider meander across the floodplain.
Residences, well heads, and roadways may require raising or some other means of flood proofing.
Downstream levees might need to be raised 2-4 feet and strengthened with riprap to withstand increased channel meandering (Elwha Report, pp. 36-37).
Removing only Elwha Dam could result in temporary aggradation.
However, since natural transport conditions would not be restored, sediment would eventually wash out of the lower river and return the riverbed to its present altered condition.
Pg. 38 = pg. 33
All action alternatives would affect water quality in the short term, primarily through increases in turbidity.
In some cases, these increases could have severe impacts on aquatic life or water quality which would require mitigation.
Construction of fish passage measures, such as those required in the Dam Retention or Single Dam Removal alternatives, would require work in the river and/or reservoir, resulting in some temporary increases in suspended sediment and other pollutants in the river.
Removing either or both dams would release stored sediment.
Suspended sediments would be washed out immediately into the river, with the majority of impacts ending within six months after dam removal.
Larger sediment (sand, gravel, cobbles) would be carried downstream over several months or even years.
Case studies have shown river systems generally recover completely from extreme sediment events within two to seven years of the time the event is complete (i.e., higher than average loads cease) (FERC, p.4-92; and see "impacts to fisheries" in this environmental impact statement).
Increases in suspended solids, especially under the Remove Glines Canyon Dam or Proposed Action scenarios, could kill large numbers of fish, their eggs, and other aquatic life in the short term.
In addition, short term increases in organic matter, bacteria, and nutrients would occur in the middle and lower reaches of the Elwha (FERC, p.4-96), potentially causing periodic lethal or harmful decreases in dissolved oxygen for aquatic life in the river.
If dam removal were sequenced over several years, fish could experience periodic lethal or harmful doses of silt and clay for as many as four or more years.
Mechanical removal of fine-grained sediment or complete stabilization of sediments on site before the dams were removed would reduce or eliminate fish kills.
Either or both of these options may be more fully examined in the Implementation EIS.
In the long run, water quality would be similar to existing conditions.
During high flows, the river would be turbid as it is now.
Increases in nutrients and organic material would result from the return of the anadromous fisheries.
This, in turn, would increase aquatic invertebrate diversity and productivity of the river below the dams.
Removing either Glines Canyon Dam or both dams would reduce downstream water temperatures as much as 4^o C in the late summer and early fall.
This would help reduce disease and increase reproductive success of anadromous fish in the lower river.
Users who draw on surface water (industrial users and fish hatcheries) could also be directly affected by sediment in the short term (FERC, p. 4-97).
Water is currently treated before use by the Rayonier and Daishowa mills since the river is turbid under high flow conditions.
The Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife rearing channel is fed directly from surface flow.
Although the tribe's hatchery is supplied with an underground infiltration gallery, water in it is only slightly less turbid than surface water because the gallery is located in coarse backfill and buried close to the surface.
Pg. 39 = pg. 34
Port Angeles's domestic water is filtered by underground gravels and sands before it reaches a Ranney collector well, and is expected to be only slightly affected (FERC, p.4-97).
If a high sediment load were carried by the river during dam removal, filtering of the sediment from the water by the underground gravels and sands could slightly reduce the capacity of the Ranney collector well.
The state is currently evaluating whether the city's supply could be contaminated through surface water sources of organisms such as Giardia lamblia, Legionella, or viruses (Washington Dept. of Health letter to U.S. Bureau of Reclamation, 1994).
The volume of water would not change with any alternative, although the location of the river or its meander pattern might.
The river is currently migrating away from the Ranney installation, causing reduced water yield.
Removing the dams could cause more frequent or wider meanders, further reducing Ranney collector well yield.
Most private wells would be unaffected regardless of alternative.
The bedrock underlying both reservoirs is nearly impermeable and the ground water gradient (flow direction) is toward the river.
Therefore, reservoir water is not recharging the surrounding upland aquifers where most of the private wells are located.
The water source for a few wells located above Lake Aldwell is in the river alluvium, within the confluence basin of Indian Creek and the Elwha River.
These wells might have lower water levels if the lake were drained.
The water levels in wells located in the Elwha River valley would be expected to have greater and more frequent fluctuations if the river returned to a more dynamic natural state.
Wells located on and near tribal land in the lower Elwha valley would be expected to have slightly higher water levels due to riverbed aggradation and higher river levels.
Mitigation
Mitigation for impacts on municipal and industrial water users from removing the dams is required by the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act.
It mandates protection of "...existing quality and availability of water from the Elwha River for municipal and industrial use from possible adverse impacts of dam removal," and goes on to say that the costs to design, construct, operate, and maintain these water quality control facilities "...will be federal costs at the discretion of the Secretary of the Interior" (See section 4(3)(b)).
A much more extensive analysis of mitigation and preferred options for each of the sediment management alternatives would be presented in the Implementation EIS.
However, only feasible and cost-effective mitigation options are being considered.
Water quality mitigation costs are inverse to sediment management costs, i.e., the more spent to reduce sediment in the river, the less water quality mitigation required.
Costs to protect water quality for municipal and industrial users range as high as $34 million and depend on sediment management (costs to protect water quality are inversely related to those for sediment management).
Pg. 40 = pg. 36
The following mitigation measures are technically feasible and, if implemented, would fulfill the congressional directive.
They are analyzed in the Draft Staff Report (pp.4-102 to 4-104) and the Elwha Report (pp.98-100).
If necessary, the Port Angeles municipal water supply could be protected through the construction and use of additional Ranney wells.
Periodic back-flushing of the Ranney well collectors might be necessary to prevent clogging.
The city's water supply and quality for industrial users could be maintained by constructing an infiltration gallery, a new inlet and settling basin, additional Ranney wells, or a diversion inlet with chemical pretreatment and a settling basin.
Improving or adding to the treatment facilities currently used by the mills could be another option to protect water quality.
Water supplied to the tribal fish hatchery would be protected if the existing infiltration pipe was relocated, a new or additional infiltration gallery built, and the original protection dike enlarged to control changes in the channel.
During public review of the draft environmental impact statement, several homeowners expressed concerns that their property could be subject to flooding and degraded water quality if the dams were removed.
Measures that would mitigate impacts to water quality and flooding for the Elwha Place Homeowners Association, including reinforced levees and other means of floodproofing, would be evaluated in the Implementation EIS.
The Dry Creek Water Association's water supply could be protected by modifying or replacing the wells closest to the Elwha River.
Mitigation for private well users is also being investigated.
In order to protect the water supplied to the mills and the Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife fish rearing channel, diversion facilities could be modified to correct existing fish passage problems at the industrial diversion dam and facilitate downstream sediment transport.
A flood protection barrier could also be constructed between the river and the rearing channel.
Raising the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers flood control levee by as much as 4 feet in some places (again, based on preliminary estimates) and armoring it with riprap would maintain the 200-year flood level of protection for residents against possible additional downstream flooding and meandering of the river (U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, 1994).
A second homeowner's levee on the west side of the same part of the Elwha floodplain might also need to be raised and/or armored to preserve its present level of protection.
Cumulative Impacts
Water quality in the lower Elwha River experiences some degradation from other sources.
Indian Creek, a major tributary which enters the Elwha above Lake Aldwell, drains a watershed that has been logged, farmed, and developed residentially.
Little River, another tributary above Elwha Dam, travels through a watershed highly disturbed by logging.
Both of these streams bring sediment and may carry trace quantities of pesticides, fertilizers, and other contaminants.
Conclusions
Present estimates, based on the interpretation of visual evidence of terraces downstream of the dams, are that the riverbed may be 1 to 5 feet lower and more channelized because of the dams.
Water is generally clear and of high quality, although it is cloudy during rainy or high flow seasons.
Releases of warmed surface water from the reservoirs have increased late summer water temperatures 2 to 4 degrees C above pre-dam conditions.
Pg. 41 = pg. 37
Construction of fish passage measures, such as those required in the Dam Retention or Single Dam Removal alternatives, would require work in the river and/or reservoir and would result in temporary increases in suspended sediment and other pollutants in the river.
Removing either or both dams would release stored sediment.
Suspended sediments would be washed out immediately into the river with the majority of impacts ceasing within six months following dam removal.
Larger sediment (sand, gravel, cobbles) would be carried downstream over several months or even years.
Increases in suspended solids, especially under the Remove Glines Canyon Dam or Proposed Action scenarios, could kill large numbers of fish, their eggs, and other aquatic life.
In addition, short term increases in organic matter, bacteria, and nutrients would occur in the middle and lower reaches of the Elwha (FERC, p.4-96), potentially causing periodic harmful decreases in dissolved oxygen for aquatic life in the river.
Although more expensive, mechanically removing sediments or stabilizing them in place would reduce the amount of sediment in the short term.
In the long term, removing both dams would reintroduce spawning gravel and nutrients for fish and return the river to a meandering, dynamic state.
It would also result in pre-dam water temperatures, and could raise the riverbed and result in localized flooding.
Removing only Glines Canyon Dam would do much the same, but would not return sand and gravel to the estuary, beaches, or Ediz Hook in the foreseeable future.
Removing only the Elwha Dam would not substantially change river morphology or water quality from existing conditions in the long term.
Only the Proposed Action would restore natural sediment transport regime and channel morphology.
Native Anadromous and Resident Fisheries
Since the impacts to native anadromous fish are rated somewhat differently in the Draft Staff Report than in the Elwha Report, a discussion of the Department of the Interior methodology for assessing impacts is presented below.
Also, this section is organized differently than other sections to make it easier to read.
Following a discussion of Interior methodology is a summary of both affected environment and impacts to Elwha salmonids.
This includes a concise analysis of restoration potential and harvest restrictions for each run of salmon or anadromous trout.
For readers who wish more information on each species, a more detailed section organized by run follows the summary of restoration potential.
This section is titled "Species Specific Impacts."
Department of the Interior Impact Methodology
In assessing impacts to native anadromous fish under each alternative, the Draft Staff Report and Elwha Report address three primary factors: available stock; ability for adults to pass over the dams as they migrate upstream and juveniles to pass downstream on their way to the sea; and the condition of the stream habitat.
A fourth, the ability to manage harvest to achieve restoration, would depend on how well the fish survive passage, condition of stream habitat, marine survival, and the number of years restoration is expected to take.
For the purposes of this environmental impact statement, the ability to manage harvest to achieve restoration is referred to as the ability to withstand fishing pressure.
Hatchery supplementation of each species is presumed to end once restoration goals have been met for any of the alternatives.
Restoration potential for each run is classified based on how successfully the run was rated under each of these factors, similar to the approach used by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.
However, there are some differences.
The commission rates losses less than 20% for passage mortality as "favorable", while Interior disagrees and believes mortality should be kept as low as technologically possible.
Further, the availability of native Elwha River genetic stock is not as important in driving restoration potential, since the Elwha Report has identified several alternative sources of genetic material Interior believes to be appropriate for restoring runs.
With these caveats, the Department of the Interior generally agrees with the following rating:
Any rated as "none" = No chance of restoration
Any rated as "unfavorable" = Poor chance of restoration
Two or three factors "marginal" = Fair chance of restoration
Two factors "favorable" = Good chance of restoration
Three factors "favorable" = Excellent chance of restoration
Table 2.
Restoration Potential of Elwha Salmonids for Each Alternative
Table 2 summarizes the restoration potential in light of each of these factors, including ability to withstand fishing pressure.
It should be noted that identical ratings of ability to withstand fishing pressure do not mean that identical fisheries would be in place.
The amount of fishing that can take place differs under each alternative.
For example, if both dams are retained, the ability of winter steelhead to withstand fishing pressure is rated as favorable.
However, this may mean that the fishery must be managed for the "catch and release" of wild fish.
On the other hand, under the Proposed Action, it will be possible to catch and keep wild fish (see the species specific impact section of this document.)
The Elwha Report presumes that either dam, if left in place, would be mitigated to a greater degree than does the commission.
These mitigation measures include increased flows over the Glines Canyon Dam spillway, screens on a relocated water intake at Glines Canyon Dam, and the possible importation of gravel to the middle and lower river if that dam is not removed.
Even so, the Elwha Report predicts poorer chances of restoring most runs than does the Draft Staff Report with either dam left in place (Elwha Report, pp.36-58, 96-105, Appendix G).
Since the Elwha Report contains more current information than the Draft Staff Report, material from the Elwha Report is summarized when there is a discrepancy between the two.
Summary of Affected Environment and Impacts to
Fisheries
Summery of Affected Environment
All species of native anadromous fish are presently prevented by Elwha Dam from accessing more than 70 miles of the Elwha River and usable tributaries, and are confined to the 4.9 miles downstream of the dam, known as the lower river.
This habitat is in poor condition: water temperatures are abnormally high during summer and early fall; spawning fish are unnaturally crowded and subject to disease; nutrient flow necessary for invertebrate (food) production and the transport of large woody debris important for cover during the winter is diminished; spawning gravels essential for successful natural reproduction are missing because they are trapped in each reservoir; and the estuary, which serves as a nursery for juvenile salmonids, is reduced in size and quality.
Pg. 43 = pg. 40
Hatchery operations below Elwha Dam presently produce chinook and coho salmon and steelhead, although there is some natural spawning of each of these and other species in the lower river.
Impacts All Native Anadromous Fish Share
Like most other natural resources, anadromous fish would experience great benefits in the long term, but may be subject to adverse impacts in the short term if both dams are removed.
The short term effects would arise primarily as a result of sediment stored behind the dams washing into the river.
Particularly the finer-grained sediments, such as silt and clay, at very high concentrations could affect fish by smothering adults, filling spaces between spawning gravels and making them unavailable to eggs, and limiting dissolved oxygen concentrations necessary for incubating salmon and trout eggs.
The degree and timing of sediment releases into the river, and thus the impacts on native anadromous fish, would depend on the selected dam removal and sediment management alternatives.
Several alternatives for each are examined in the Elwha Report as required by the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act.
A few of these methods will be expanded and analyzed in the Implementation EIS.
If both dams were removed and most of the accumulated sediment washed out by winter storms within one year, there would be the potential for loss of an entire brood year of naturally spawned native anadromous fish, although multiple year classes of some fish and efforts to remove some fish to hatchery facilities would mitigate this loss.
If dams were removed sequentially and sediment managed by downstream coffer dams or stabilized on site, adverse impacts to fish would be further limited.
Dredging and slurrying fine sediments would substantially reduce the amount of sediment entering the river.
For comparison purposes, Interior examined recovery after other actions that resulted in larger than usual amounts of sediment in Pacific Northwest rivers used by salmonids.
Although clearcut logging can send 2.5-3 times (approximately 3,200 cubic yards per square mile) the material into streams as would naturally be transported in the Elwha River (an estimated 1,200 cubic yards per square mile), using it for comparison would underestimate the impacts of releasing sediment now stored behind the Elwha dams.
The May 18, 1980, eruption of Mount St. Helens and aftermath would overestimate the impact more than 50-fold, but may serve as a useful comparison.
The volcanic eruption caused a debris flow that sent an estimated three billion cubic yards of material into the upper 17 miles of the North Fork Toutle River basin and approximately 50 million cubic yards into the South Fork Toutle River (Lucas 1985).
Approximately 90% of the upper North Fork and tributaries previously accessible to salmon were buried up to 213 yards deep by mud flows.
Riparian vegetation, important to fish because it shades streams and keeps water temperatures cool, was completely wiped out along the Toutle.
In contrast, the total estimated sediment accumulation within the two Elwha reservoirs is 17 million cubic yards, and existing riparian vegetation along the Elwha would be unaffected should the Proposed Action be implemented.
Pg. 44 = pg. 41
The eruption devastated most of the anadromous fish habitat in the Toutle River; initially, many adult salmonids avoided entering it because of high sediment loads and strayed to other Columbia River tributaries (Lucas 1985).
However, natural fish recovery began quickly.
The first adult summer steelhead was observed in the North Fork Toutle River in August 1980, only three months after the eruption.
Steelhead redds (spawning nests) were observed in a North Fork and many South Fork Toutle River tributaries.
Fry (juveniles) were later captured in these tributaries, indicating successful reproduction (Rawding 1995).
The numbers of yearling and older steelhead increased ten-fold from 1981 to 1984 in a South Fork tributary (Lucas 1985).
Despite the devastation wreaked on the Toutle River anadromous fishery by the eruption, recovery began immediately and continues today.
Conditions in the Elwha River, even under the worst of circumstances for short-term impacts to fish (i.e., natural erosion), would be far better and restoration expected to occur much more quickly.
By run, the restoration potential for Elwha species if the Proposed Action were implemented is summarized below.
More information is available in the section "Species Specific Impacts."
Summary of Impacts
As explained above, four factors were evaluated to determine a species' chances of restoration--available stock, passage mortality, habitat and fishing pressure.
A summary of the impacts of each of these factors on restoration potential for Elwha River salmon and seagoing trout is presented below.
Available Stock: One of these factors--available stock--remains constant regardless of the alternative.
The Elwha Report (Appendix G) lists 28 different options for restoring the 10 original Elwha fish stocks.
In addition, this environmental impact statement includes more information on sources of stock in the Responses to Comment section on "Fisheries."
Availability of suitable stocks are considered:
"favorable" for summer/fall chinook salmon; "marginal/favorable" for winter steelhead;
"marginal" for coho and chum salmon, summer steelhead and searun char; "unfavorable/marginal" for spring chinook, pink and sockeye salmon; and "unknown" for searun cutthroat trout.
(See Elwha Report, Appendix G).
Passage: As noted under the "Methodology" section, Interior has assumed state-of-the-art fish passage measures for the purposes of this environmental impact statement.
Yet, Interior disagrees with the Draft Staff Report assumption that up to 20% mortality from passage is "favorable," and so also disagrees with commission findings on the impacts of fish passage to Elwha anadromous fish.
Although passage mortality varies among species, pink, chum, and sockeye salmon would be expected to encounter the most problems at Elwha Dam.
Both pink and chum salmon produce juveniles that begin migrating downstream within hours of hatching.
Because they are very small, they would be unable to effectively negotiate the reservoirs and could suffer significant mortalities at screens proposed for the penstocks.
If Elwha Dam were removed, the middle stretch of river would become available to pink and chum, although habitat quality in this stretch would remain poor.
Pg. 45 = pg. 42
The Elwha Dam now blocks travel to and from Lake Sutherland for sockeye salmon that need the lake to reproduce.
Although fish passage measures at Elwha Dam would allow sockeye to complete the journey, smolts of this species lose their scales at a higher rate than all other salmon species, and descaling during passage at Elwha Dam could be significant.
Removal of Elwha Dam or Proposed Action would allow sockeye salmon unimpeded access to Lake Sutherland.
Based on studies conducted at Lake Mills, spring and summer/fall chinook salmon juveniles would likely suffer significant losses migrating downstream through the reservoir and past Glines Canyon Dam.
Also, a large number of adult spring chinook salmon would die while migrating upstream past fish passage facilities (the trap-and-haul facility at Glines Canyon Dam) because these fish are sensitive to handling following their entry into fresh water.
Passage survival is rated as "unfavorable" for spring chinook if either the Dam Retention or Removal of Elwha Dam alternative is selected.
Summer/ fall chinook salmon, more tolerant of handling, are rated "marginal" if the Removal of Elwha Dam alternative is selected.
Research and experience with searun cutthroat trout and char at fish passage facilities are limited.
Further investigation is necessary to define the criteria for effective passage of these fish.
Until then, Interior has rated the ability of these fish to pass the facilities proposed for the Elwha and Glines Canyon Dams as "unknown."
Pink, chum, sockeye, spring and summer/fall chinook salmon, searun cutthroat trout, and char have poorer chances for restoration under the mitigated Dam Retention alternative (Elwha Report, p.35) than if one dam is removed.
Only coho salmon and winter and summer steelhead are thought to have even a "marginal" chance of surviving passage, and are rated as having "fair" restoration potential if both dams remain.
In all alternatives that retain at least one dam, passage survival limits chances of restoration.
Habitat: The third factor, habitat, is particularly important to the long-term sustainability of all runs of salmon and trout.
Currently, both the middle and lower sections of the river have very little spawning-size gravel the fish need to lay their eggs.
Riffles and pools, important for juvenile rearing, are far less abundant than before the dams were built.
Water temperatures are higher than under pre-dam conditions because the still waters of the reservoirs are warmed by the sun and store heat, which is later released downstream.
The two dams also limit the downstream transport of nutrients and woody debris essential to aquatic invertebrates and fish.
Glines Canyon Dam bars the natural transport of these materials into the middle reach as well as the lower 4.9 miles below Elwha Dam; reservoirs inundate habitat which was riverine and used by fish before the dams were built.
These conditions would largely continue under the No Action, Dam Retention (with mitigation), or Removal of Elwha Dam alternatives.
Removal of the Glines Canyon Dam would restore habitat in the middle stretch of river between the dams and allow natural transport of nutrients and debris as far as Elwha Dam.
Removal of the Elwha Dam would release up to 4 million cubic yards of sediment deposited in Lake Aldwell, but would not affect the significant amounts of sediments, nutrients, and woody debris trapped in Lake Mills.
Gravel released by removing Elwha Dam would probably wash out to sea, returning the lower river to its current armored condition.
Pg. 46 = pg. 44
If the Proposed Action were implemented, habitats would improve to pre-dam conditions over the long-term for all species except sockeye salmon.
Sockeye require a freshwater lake to complete their life cycle; the only one accessible from the Elwha River, Lake Sutherland, has been degraded by development along its shoreline.
Removing the dams would only improve the riverine habitat for this species.
Ability to Withstand Fishing Pressure- Of the four factors evaluated, fishing pressure is a regional concern which is not directly addressed in the Elwha Restoration Act.
Some specific information on fishing pressure or ability to manage harvest to achieve restoration is presented throughout this section.
More generalized information on the additive impact of fish pressure in the marine environment is detailed in the cumulative impacts section.
Achieving the restoration goals for the Elwha would require the prudent management of intercepting fisheries in order to ensure that the necessary number of fish survive to spawn each year.
The ability to take the realistic management actions to get fish back to the spawning grounds depends in large part on the size of each run.
Under any of the scenarios where the dams remain in place, the dams themselves reduce the number of fish, leaving fewer salmon and trout for harvest, thus reducing management flexibility.
If either one or both dams remain in place, the ability to adjust fishing pressure to meet the needs of pink and chum salmon is rated as "unfavorable" or "marginal".
Although the fishing pressure on these species is generally very low, the high numbers of fish destroyed by the dams as well as the poor habitat conditions leave virtually no fish for harvest, and allow for no realistic management actions to occur.
Coho salmon also have a rating of "unfavorable" or "marginal" if at least one dam remains.
Although the number of fish surviving over the dams is relatively high, the number of fish caught in the ocean is also high.
Therefore, to ensure adequate numbers of coho return to the river to spawn would require major changes in marine fisheries and a complete closure of the river fishery.
Such large scale modifications to fisheries would be very difficult to achieve.
Most other species are rated as "marginal" under any dam retention alternative.
That is, the number of fish lost to the dams can be more or less accommodated by realistic changes in fisheries management.
For summer and winter steelhead, cutthroat trout, and native char, the effect of fishing pressure is rated as "favorable" under all alternatives.
This is because almost all of the harvest of these fish takes place in the river where the flexibility to manage fisheries is the greatest.
Under the Proposed Action, the effect of fishing pressure is rated as "favorable" for all species except coho salmon, which is rated as "marginal".
The "marginal" rating is due to the need to move from a hatchery-based fishery (which does not require as many spawning fish) to a natural stock fishery (which requires more spawning fish).
Making this change in management strategy might take several years.
Pg. 47 = pg. 45
Restoration Potential and Harvest Restrictions of Elwha Salmonids
The Department of the Interior used the same Ricker spawner/recruit models as in the Draft Staff Report with modifications to predict recovery for six major salmon and steelhead runs in the Elwha River (summer/fall chinook, coho, chum, pink, winter steelhead and summer steelhead).
Ricker models can predict recovery time, given the number of initial spawners, maximum escapement (i.e., no harvest), rate of increase for each stock, and optimum harvest rate.
Interior modifications to the Draft Staff Report analysis reflect present stock conditions and updated harvest rates for Strait of Juan de Fuca stocks, and do not presume any outplanting or hatchery production.
The effects of outplanting on the restoration timeframe are noted in the text.
The status and recovery of the remaining anadromous salmonid species (spring chinook, sockeye, searun cutthroat and char) is summarized in relation to these models and best available information.
These models of recovery were compared to results at Sunset Falls, an area of stream habitat made available in 1958 by the Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife to anadromous fish in the South Fork Skykomish River.
Full utilization--comparable to recovery in the Elwha River--was typically between three and five cycles for most species.
Data are presented in tabular form in Table 3.
Summer/fall chinook salmon
The Elwha stock of summer/fall chinook is currently sustained by both natural and hatchery production.
Using Ricker curve-based recovery models, peak returns of chinook could occur in five cycles (21-25 years) if the Proposed Action were implemented.
Total new production would equal approximately 31,360 chinook per year.
This modeling assumes no outplanting or hatchery involvement.
If both were used to speed restoration of this run in the Elwha, recovery time would fall by one-half.
Under the No Action alternative, no new chinook production would result.
Adopting the Dam Retention alternative would require 29-32 years to recover, adding 16,000 new fish annually.
Recovery under the Remove Glines Canyon Dam alternative would occur in 29-33 years, creating new production of approximately 25,670 fish per year.
Removing only Elwha Dam would produce an estimated 20,000 chinook per year after a 29-33 year recovery period.
There are presently no in-river commercial or sport fisheries for chinook salmon in the Elwha River.
As many as 150 chinook have been taken from the Elwha in past years during test fisheries, or incidental to fisheries for other species.
An additional few are caught in the Strait of Juan de Fuca sport fishery and in net fisheries just to the west of the river mouth.
Approximately 61% of the Elwha chinook run is harvested in commercial fisheries in the marine environment (Elwha Report, p.16).
Under the Proposed Action, existing chinook harvest restrictions in the Elwha would likely be in place for the first three complete cycles (10-12 years).
Additional harvest restrictions in localized marine fisheries (e.g., area closures in the Freshwater Bay vicinity) might be necessary during the same time period.
Harvest restrictions in other Washington sport and commercial fisheries or Canadian fisheries to specifically accommodate Elwha restoration are not probable, as the depressed status of many other native Western Washington and Columbia River chinook stocks is likely to have a larger influence in shaping fisheries for the foreseeable future.
Elwha chinook will benefit from management actions aimed at rebuilding these other stocks.
Under any of the other options, the above harvest restrictions could be in place indefinitely.
Pg. 48 = pg. 46
Spring chinook salmon
Elwha spring chinook, if present, are likely only in small numbers.
However, Interior scientists predict that some summer/fall chinook entering the Elwha would swim much farther upstream.
These individuals would, over several decades, give rise to a spring run.
Active outplanting of eggs and young juveniles in the upper river could accelerate the process.
Under the Proposed Action, no additional harvest restrictions for this stock beyond those already in place for other rebuilding Puget Sound spring chinook stocks would likely be needed.
Harvest restrictions under the other alternatives were not examined, as the anticipated recovery time far exceeds the ability to foresee harvest options.
Coho salmon
Elwha coho are currently sustained by both natural and hatchery production, although hatchery fish predominate.
Using Ricker models to predict recovery rates, peak returns of wild coho (approximately 34,570 fish per year) could occur in as few as five cycles (15-18 years) if the Proposed Action were implemented.
Outplanting would reduce recovery time by one-half.
Under the No Action alternative, no new coho production would result.
The Dam Retention alternative would annually produce an estimated 24,960 coho in 29-32 years.
Recovery under the Glines Canyon Dam removal alternative would yield approximately 31,190 fish per year by 22-25 years.
Removing the Elwha Dam would annually produce an estimated 27,680 fish in 26-29 years.
Under the Proposed Action, and presuming continued hatchery augmentation during the rebuilding phase (Elwha Report, Appendix G), harvest restrictions in the Elwha River would be relatively minor and designed to mitigate impacts suffered during the deconstruction and post-deconstruction period (approximately five years).
Harvest restrictions similar to those required for chinook salmon in marine fisheries (e.g., area closures in the Freshwater Bay area) might be necessary during the same five-year period.
Also, as with chinook, harvest restrictions in other Washington sport and commercial fisheries or Canadian fisheries to specifically accommodate Elwha restoration are not probable, as the depressed status of other Western Washington and Columbia River coho stocks is likely to have a larger influence in shaping fisheries for the foreseeable future.
Under any of the other alternatives, the length of time harvests in the Elwha River and adjacent marine waters would need to be curtailed is extended.
Also, specific accommodation of the Elwha River restoration process might be needed in the Pacific Salmon Treaty forum if present negotiations between the United States and Canada regarding other coho stocks of concern do not result in adequate reductions of fisheries.
Winter steelhead
The early returning portion of the winter steelhead run is heavily supported by hatchery production.
The late portion of the run is wild and is considered depressed due to loss of habitat related to the dams.
Based on Ricker models (with no outplanting or hatchery influence), peak production (10,100 fish per year) of wild steelhead could occur in as few as five cycles (15-18 years) under the Proposed Action.
Outplanting of eggs or alevins in the upper watershed would reduce this time by one-half.
Harvest restrictions, such as catch and release of wild steelhead, would likely be in place until sufficient numbers of spawners return to the river (12-16 years).
No harvest restrictions are anticipated for marine areas.
Pg. 49 = pg. 47
Under the No Action alternative, no new production would result.
Under the Dam Retention alternative, new annual production would be up to approximately 7,300 fish in 29-32 years.
Recovery under the Glines Canyon Dam removal alternative would yield an estimated 9,000 winter steelhead per year in 30-35 years.
Removing only Elwha Dam would produce approximately 8,270 fish within 30-35 years.
Under any of these alternatives, catch and release sport fisheries could be required in perpetuity.
In addition, in-river net fisheries would need to be limited from present levels, to varying degrees.
Again, no restrictions would be anticipated for marine fisheries.
Summer steelhead
The outlook for restoration of summer steelhead would be similar to that of winter steelhead, although the restoration period might be longer (20-25 years) for the Proposed Action.
Similarly, the restoration period under each of the other alternatives would be similar to the winter steelhead, but extended one or two cycles more.
Under the Proposed Action, harvest restrictions would consist of catch and release of wild summer steelhead, as already implemented throughout the state.
Monitoring of adult returns would determine when harvest restrictions could be lifted.
Under any other alternative, it is anticipated that the catch and release restriction would be in place indefinitely.
Pink salmon
Elwha pink salmon are a native, wild stock of critical status, as evidenced by chronically low escapements (four returning fish in 1989, none in 1993).
Brood stock might come from the adjacent Dungeness River stock, depending on its status.
At Sunset Falls (Skykomish River), returns remained low until a population threshold of 2,000 adults was reached, after which numbers increased rapidly.
Similarly, new pink production within the Elwha would likely remain low until a minimum threshold was reached.
Ricker curve modeling predicts peak production of 274,286 pink salmon occurring in 8-10 cycles (16-20 years) if Proposed Action is implemented.
Outplanting or remote incubator sites would enhance this effort, shortening the time needed for recovery.
Under the No Action, Dam Retention, and Glines Canyon Dam removal alternatives, no increase in the pink salmon population is expected.
Some production of pink salmon would be expected to accompany the Remove Elwha Dam alternative, but habitat in the lower and middle river would remain in poor condition, limiting the pink salmon as a harvestable resource within the watershed.
The Elwha River is now closed to the harvest of pink salmon.
Under the Proposed Action, no additional harvest restrictions in marine areas would be anticipated, as the harvest rate is already at the level needed for restoration purposes.
Monitoring for pink salmon would determine when in-river fisheries for pink salmon could begin.
Pg. 50 = pg. 48
Under any of the other alternatives, passage mortality and habitat limitations are likely to drive the Elwha pink salmon stock to extinction.
There are no realistic harvest management measures which may be taken to prevent this from occurring.
Chum salmon
The Elwha chum salmon population is estimated at 200-500 returning adults.
Chum population dynamics and life histories are similar to that of pink salmon in that spawning occurs over a relatively short period, the eggs incubate concurrently, hatching and emerging from the gravel at approximately the same time.
Migration to salt water is accomplished passively and en masse in an attempt to numerically overwhelm predators.
However, this requires the production of large numbers of alevins before substantial population increases occur.
Like Sunset Falls pink salmon, Elwha chum could remain at low numbers until a large increase in survival allowed rapid population increases.
Under the Proposed Action, Ricker models predict chum recovery (36,000 fish) in as few as six cycles (18-21 years) without enhancement (outplanting or hatchery) efforts.
Outplanting or remote incubator sites would significantly help and shorten the time needed for recovery.
Under the No Action, Dam Retention, or Glines Canyon Dam Removal options, no increase in the chum salmon population would be expected.
Some production of chum would be expected under the Removal of Elwha Dam alternative, but habitat in the lower and middle river would remain in poor condition, limiting the chum as a harvestable resource within the watershed.
Under the Proposed Action, it would be necessary to close the sport and commercial harvests of chum salmon in the Elwha during the early years of restoration.
This is not considered a significant restriction since the present harvest in the river is estimated to be only in the tens of fish.
No additional restrictions of marine fisheries would be expected.
As with pink salmon, passage mortality and habitat limitations under any of the other alternatives are likely to drive the Elwha chum salmon stock to extremely low levels or extinction.
There are no realistic harvest management measures which may be taken to prevent this from occurring.
Sockeye salmon
Elwha River sockeye salmon are essentially extinct.
Of the various options, only the Proposed Action and Remove Elwha Dam alternatives would allow sockeye access to Lake Sutherland.
Because sockeye require a lake environment to successfully rear, the other alternatives do not restore sockeye salmon to the Elwha River.
Sockeye restoration would probably require augmentation of the anadromous component of kokanee (landlocked sockeye) that reside in Lake Sutherland or the importation of a suitable stock.
Since the recovery rate of sockeye was not addressed in the Draft Staff Report, a rebuilding curve based on Sunset Falls chum was used to simulate a sockeye recovery.
Once sufficient numbers of brood are secured, recovery could occur rapidly, as much as 6,500 adults per year in 3-5 cycles.
A remote site incubation station would help boost production of this stock.
Since there is no stock of sockeye in the Elwha at this time, harvest restrictions have not been determined.
Restrictions would depend on the recovery success of sockeye in the river and the timing of the stock's return.
Harvest restrictions under both the Proposed Action or Remove Elwha alternative would be identical.
As recovery is not likely due to passage and stock constraints for the other options, no attempt to evaluate harvests was required.
Pg. 51 = pg. 49
Searun cutthroat
The status of Elwha River anadromous cutthroat trout is unknown, although a small population is believed to persist.
Since resident cutthroat in the upper Elwha probably produce seagoing smolts, similar to that of resident rainbow trout, restoration is expected to occur naturally.
However, the restoration timeframe is unknown for this stock.
Under any of the options, a closure of the in-river sport fishery might be needed until the population size has significantly increased.
Table 3.
New Wild Production (Number of fish/year) for Salmon and Steelhead and Time (Years) to Recovery*
No Action** Dam Retention Glines Canyon Dam Removal Elwha Dam Removal Proposed Action Chinook 1,500-2,000 fish+ 16,060 fish 29 33 years 25,670 fish 29 33 years 20,020 fish 29 33 years 31,360 fish 21 25 years Coho 
29 32 years 9,017 fish
30 35 years 8,272 fish
30 35 years 10,100 fish 15 18 years Sockeye 0 0 0 6,500 fish
12 20 years 6,500 fish
12 20 years
* Assuming no outplanting.
Outplanting may reduce recovery time by as much as half.
** No Action (existing conditions) would not result in any new wild salmon or steelhead.
These figures are estimates of current production of wild anadromous fish in the Elwha River (P. Crain, Lower Elwha S'Klallam Tribal Hatchery, personal communication, 1995).
+ All Elwha chinook and coho are considered a composite of wild and hatchery stocks.
Searun char (Dolly Varden and bull trout)
The status and restoration of Elwha River anadromous char are similar to that of searun cutthroat trout, although there is a larger population of char than cutthroat in the upper river.
Restoration of this stock is expected to occur naturally.
Under any of the options, a closure of the in-river sport fishery might be needed until the population size has significantly increased.
Pg. 52 = pg. 50
Species-Specific Impacts
This section will examine impacts and restoration potential in more detail than the summaries presented above for each run of salmon or seagoing trout known to historically inhabit the Elwha River.
Although this document addresses some species separately, runs that would experience similar problems in traversing the dams are analyzed as groups.
The following impact sections generally compare effects resulting from passage first and then to habitat for each of the alternatives.
Since stock availability remains constant regardless of the alternative, it is presented in the affected environment portion.
Ability to withstand harvest pressure is summarized by run in Table 2 and discussed further in the cumulative impact section of fisheries.
Pink and Chum Salmon
Affected Environment.
Pink salmon enter the river from July through September, chum in October and November (see Table 4).
Both spawn almost immediately, using smaller sized gravels.
The traditional spawning grounds for pink and chum salmon are thought to be primarily the first 16 miles of mainstem Elwha River, as well as tributaries such as Indian Creek and Little River.
It is unknown whether these species occupied areas farther upstream.
Both pink and chum generally spawn in low gradient side channels and tributaries.
Since the two dams block the transport of spawning gravel, habitat downstream of them for pink and chum salmon has been effectively eliminated.
Juveniles swim toward the sea within hours or days of hatching, and usually do not feed on their journey.
Because they are so small, they cannot swim as well as older juveniles of other species and are (generally) passively swept to the river mouth by the downstream current.
Juveniles of both species usually spend up to two months maturing in estuaries, brackish pools at the mouth of rivers, or nearshore marine habitat.
This habitat on the Elwha River is also degraded and reduced in size as a result of the dams blocking natural sediment transport.
Chances of finding the original native stock for pink salmon are considered unfavorable, although the neighboring Dungeness River supports two stocks of pink salmon, at least one of which could flourish in the Elwha River.
A small population of native chum remains in the Elwha River, although pink and chum historically represented the largest contribution to the fish biomass returned through the system to the upper watershed.
Impacts.
The impacts to pink and chum salmon under the No Action alternative have been near elimination of both species.
It is estimated that fewer than 50 Elwha pink salmon return in odd years (this species returns only in odd years), but only four were found in 1989, and none in 1993.
The total annual chum salmon returns to the river are measured in hundreds (Elwha Report, p.14).
Under any alternative, chum may be unable to clear a low diversion structure at river mile 3.
Mitigation options or redesign of the structure to resolve this or other potential problems with the diversion intake would be part of the Implementation EIS. Pg. 53 = pg. 51
For the Dam Retention or single dam removal alternatives, the continuing presence of the reservoirs would present an enormous downstream passage problem for juvenile pink and chum salmon.
These small fish cannot navigate their way quickly through either reservoir because the currents do not have the water velocity needed for juvenile migration.
A portion would starve before reaching the spillways while many others would be susceptible to predation.
Although screens to keep fish from being sucked into the turbines at each dam could potentially be sized to keep juvenile pink and chum salmon out, a survey of dams in the Pacific Northwest revealed no self-sustaining populations of pink or chum salmon above major impoundments (J. Meyer, Olympic National Park, personal communication, July 1994).
Regardless of efforts to accommodate upstream migration by spawning adults, extremely poor reservoir passage would be expected to eliminate any chance these species have for restoration in the Elwha River if either the Dam Retention or Removal of the Glines Canyon Dam alternative is implemented.
Table 4.
In-River Life Cycle Stages of Elwha Salmonids
With Removal of the Elwha Dam, several miles of unobstructed river would be opened to pink and chum in their traditional spawning grounds.
Although these species might fare slightly better under this scenario than either the Removal of the Glines Canyon Dam or Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternative, available habitat would still be nearly devoid of spawning-sized gravel due to the continued presence of Glines Canyon Dam.
For these reasons, the chances of restoring pink and chum salmon are rated as "none/poor" or ^"poor" under all alternatives except the Proposed Action, where each is given a "good" chance for restoration.
Searun Cutthroat Trout and Char (Dolly Varden and Bull Trout)
Affected Environment.
Cutthroat primarily use tributaries to spawn and rear whereas char may use tributaries or the mainstem river.
Except for portions inundated by the two reservoirs, the tributaries are generally in excellent condition.
However, the mainstream habitat below Glines Canyon Dam is in poor condition as a result of trapped gravel in the reservoirs, elevated water temperatures, and the limitation of nutrient and woody debris flow.
It is unknown whether original native stock exists for these species.
A large population of resident (no sea migration) native char and a smaller population of cutthroat trout exist above Lake Mills.
Some of these residents apparently retain the ability to produce juveniles which undergo physiological changes allowing them to exist in a saltwater environment (become smolts); these, in fact, may be descendants of the original Elwha sea going race.
These resident populations may be usable as brood stock to reestablish sea going runs of both of these species.
Because there is a larger population of char than cutthroat in the Elwha River, Interior has rated stock availability as "marginal" for searun char and "unknown" for cutthroat.
Impacts.
Searun cutthroat and native char (Dolly Varden and bull trout) are present in the river (No Action alternative, or current conditions) below Elwha Dam in low numbers.
A small population of land-locked cutthroat and a larger population of native char exist above the Elwha Dam.
These species could have problems passing over the dams.
Adults, smaller than native anadromous salmon, might not be able to ascend the ladder designed for larger fish at Elwha Dam (Elwha Report, p.56).
Additional investigation is necessary to determine the passage criteria for these fish.
Pg. 54 = pg. 53
Neither cutthroat nor char adults necessarily die immediately after spawning, but instead often return to the sea.
Cutthroat trout may swim upstream without spawning, return to the ocean, and come back the next summer or fall to spawn.
Fish screens proposed by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission and the joint fish and wildlife agencies (U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Bureau of Indian Affairs, National Park Service, National Marine Fisheries Service, Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife, Point No Point Treaty Council, and the Lower Elwha S'Klallam Tribe) to prevent juvenile salmon and trout from entering the turbines may not work well for adult-sized trout, so losses are expected in their downstream migration as well, i.e., for either Dam Retention or single dam removal alternatives.
No tests have been performed to determine whether these seagoing trout can negotiate the dams, and so their ability to withstand passage is "unknown."
The availability and condition of habitat is a potential problem if the dams remain in place.
Some of the prime tributaries for cutthroat trout are blocked or inundated by Lake Mills, or lie between the dams.
Removal of the Elwha Dam or the Proposed Action would allow cutthroat access to the tributary habitat between the dams.
Habitat is rated at a higher quality with these alternatives than with removal of Glines Canyon Dam.
Although char prefer main channels, this habitat is in poor condition in both the lower and middle river and would not be fully restored unless both dams are removed.
Habitat is rated as "marginal" with both dams in place and "marginal" to "favorable" if one is removed.
Chinook and Coho Salmon and Steelhead Trout
If the dams are removed, each of these species would have either a "good" or "excellent" chance for restoration.
The pre-dam Elwha River supported early runs and later summer and fall runs of chinook salmon.
The same is true for winter steelhead, which swim up the Elwha from December through February, and summer steelhead that swim up in March through August.
Summer and winter steelhead and spring and summer/fall chinook are distinct "races" of fish.
The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission estimates that the Elwha once produced more than 31,000 wild chinook (FERC, p. 4-150).
Currently, 2,000-4,000 hatchery chinook return to the river, but are restricted to the 4.9 miles below Elwha Dam.
This creates crowded conditions for the spawning adults, with approximately five times the density of redds per river mile as in other streams (FERC, p.3-33).
Chinook, coho, and steelhead are all produced in hatcheries in the Elwha River.
Coho have been raised in hatchery operations since 1965, which include plantings from the Dungeness River from 1967 to 1976.
The state rearing channel was used to rear and release coho from 1974 to 1982.
The Elwha tribal facility has been releasing coho since 1977, and has been the only source of hatchery coho since 1983.
Since 1977, coho returns have ranged from 5,000 to 18,000 per year, with the majority being hatchery fish.
Because of the hatchery operation, the Lower Elwha S'Klallam Tribe operates a commercial in-river fishery for steelhead.
Steelhead harvests average 1,600 fish per year for the tribe (Elwha Report, p. 17).
Approximately 3,800 winter adults enter the river from an average of 80,000 hatchery smolts released each year (FERC, p.3-41).
Sports fishers harvest an estimated 1,150 winter and 460 summer steelhead each year.
Pg. 55 = pg. 55
Chinook
Affected Environment.
Before the dams were built, it is believed that chinook entering the river in the spring swam farther upriver and spawned upstream of Carlson Canyon Falls at river mile 34.
Fish entering in the late summer or fall spawned downstream of river mile 34.
Chinook require cool water (below 14 C) and medium-size spawning gravel.
They usually lay their eggs in a main channel of the river rather than its side channels or tributaries.
Adult chinook die within weeks of spawning, and the juveniles may stay in the Elwha for three months to more than a year before migrating to the sea.
All juveniles spend some time in the estuary as they grow and adapt to salt water.
Estuary size is shrinking, however, due to sediment trapped behind the dams.
A suitable stock of summer/fall chinook is presently available since this variety is maintained in Washington State hatchery facilities.
However, a separate spring entry of spring chinook could be missing altogether in the Elwha River.
The genetics of Elwha spring chinook presumably remain intact in the summer/fall stock (Brannon and Hershberger, 1984).
Fully restoring the summer/fall run and making spring chinook habitat available upstream of river mile 34 is considered likely to result in separation of the two stocks.
For all alternatives, the stock availability for summer/fall chinook was classed "favorable" and for spring chinook as "unfavorable/marginal" (see Table 2).
Impacts to chinook.
Juvenile chinook would be expected to experience relatively high mortalities passing through the reservoirs and over both Elwha and Glines Canyon dams.
These juveniles need a swift current, not created in reservoirs, to help them navigate their way to the ocean.
Resident trout in these reservoirs would feed on the juvenile chinook, reducing the population during the downstream migration.
Elevated water temperatures under the No Action or Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternative would continue to result in increased adult mortalities from diseases in the lower river.
Spring chinook, particularly sensitive to handling after entering the freshwater environment, would encounter the trap-and-haul process at a point 13 miles upstream (Elwha Report, p.54) under the Dam Retention or Removal of Elwha Dam alternatives.
Some summer/fall chinook that enter the river when flows are low and temperatures are high would die as a result of handling.
More chinook losses would be expected at Glines Canyon Dam and Lake Mills than from Elwha Dam and Lake Aldwell.
While no passage would occur under the No Action alternative, the Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternative would result in losses estimated in the 50% range for both spring and fall chinook.
Removal of the Elwha Dam would reduce this to approximately 30% (FERC p.4-192), while Removal of the Glines Canyon Dam would reduce losses to approximately 15% (FERC, p.4-164).
The Proposed Action would result in no fish lost through dam passage or in reservoirs.
Habitat for the spring chinook is relatively intact since it is upstream of both dams.
However, sections of the river below the dams in which fall chinook would normally spawn are nearly devoid of spawning-sized gravel.
Higher than pre-dam water temperatures in the summer and early fall can kill chinook eggs and aggravate Dermocystidium, a potentially lethal disease for fish.
Pg. 56 = pg. 55
Higher than normal water temperatures would continue to be a problem under all alternatives except Removal of Glines Canyon Dam or Proposed Action.
Spring chinook spawning habitat would remain in favorable condition but inaccessible or marginally available due to passage problems.
With the Proposed Action, habitat would be fully restored along the entire length of the river, including the reintroduction of spawning gravel and lower water temperatures.
Removal of the Elwha Dam could temporarily send sediment into the lower river and result in fish kills, but it would also alleviate crowded conditions and possibly reduce incidence of Dermocystidium.
Removal of Glines Canyon Dam would release sediment into the middle stretch of the Elwha River, reseeding the area with spawning-size gravel and allowing temperatures to return to pre-dam conditions (Elwha Report, p. 46).
No spawning gravel would make it to the lower river, however, and the transport of nutrients and woody debris would continue to be limited.
Overall chances for restoring fall and spring chinook in the Elwha are rated "poor" if both dams are retained, "fair/good" if only Glines Canyon Dam is removed, and "poor/fair" if only Elwha Dam is removed.
Restoration potential increases to "good" for spring chinook and "excellent" for summer/fall chinook if both dams are removed.
Coho
Affected Environment.
Coho enter the Elwha River from August through December and spawn in the late fall and winter.
Juveniles live in the river longer than a year after hatching before they migrate to sea in their second spring.
Adults spawn in tributaries and mainstream river channels (with slopes no more than an average 1-3%) and die shortly after spawning.
Juveniles live in pools, ponds, and backwater areas before they leave the river.
Suitable stock, available both in the river and in the hatchery, is rated "marginal" by Interior.
Impacts to Coho.
Like chinook, adult coho would be expected to experience some losses passing the fish ladder at Elwha Dam and undergoing the trap-and-haul procedure at Lake Mills.
Some juveniles would remain in the reservoirs (residualize) and many would not make it to the dams before they were eaten by predators.
A percentage of those fish arriving at the dams would be lost either going over the spillways or through the turbines.
Estimates of 30% losses from passage of adult and juvenile coho passing both dams compared to approximately 50% for chinook are found in FERC (p. 4-22).
Interior rates the coho's ability to survive passage as "marginal" under the Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternative.
The Eicher screens proposed by the commission to route salmon and trout away from Elwha Dam turbines were generally successful in tests involving juvenile coho, so losses from downstream migration would be expected to be lower if this dam, rather than Glines Canyon, remained.
However, additional tests of the Eicher screen with smaller coho are needed to determine passage effectiveness for these fish.
Screens proposed by Interior and other agencies for the Glines Canyon Dam intake would reduce losses of juvenile coho, but losses from navigating the spillways and residualism (disorientation and delay in the reservoir) would remain (Elwha Report, p.35).
Ability to withstand mortality from passage is rated as "marginal" for both single dam alternatives.
In the Proposed Action, passage problems would be eliminated for all fish.
Pg. 57 = pg. 57
Although coho prefer spawning in tributaries that are not too steep, they will also use the main river and particularly side channel habitat.
Coho habitat now exists in the river upstream of the Lake Mills delta, but much of the habitat in the middle and lower reach not inundated by the reservoirs is either too steep or does not have the small gravel needed for spawning.
Under the No Action or Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternative, the water in the middle reach also would be warmer, contain fewer nutrients, and would not have the large logs and other debris that juveniles seek for winter cover.
Removal of the Glines Canyon Dam would reseed the middle reach with small gravel and, in the long-term, provide several miles of low gradient spawning habitat in the main channel.
Woody debris needed for overwintering juveniles would be released naturally throughout most of the river, but would be limited in the lower Elwha.
For adult coho that passed over Elwha Dam, nearly 65 miles of tributary and main channel habitat (coho would not be expected to pass Carlson Canyon Falls) would be available for spawning (FERC, p.4-24).
At present, only the 4.9 miles of mainstream river are available for coho to spawn and rear, and the habitat in these miles is in very poor condition.
Removal of the Elwha Dam would provide some gravel to the lower Elwha River, eliminate passage mortality up to Glines Canyon Dam, restore 2.8 miles of currently inundated, low gradient river, and allow access to 8.5 additional miles of habitat.
The entire middle stretch would remain gravel deficient and the lower stretch would eventually return to its present poor condition as sediments from behind Elwha Dam washed out to sea.
For both the No Action and Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternatives, the habitat problems described above become additive.
The middle and lower river would remain gravel starved with important tributary space inundated; woody debris would continue to be blocked and unavailable for juvenile coho wintering in the Elwha River.
Habitat is rated as "marginal" for coho under either alternative.
Overall chances for restoration are: "None" for No Action; "fair" for Dam Retention (with mitigation); "fair/good" for Removal of the Glines Canyon Dam; "fair" for Removal of the Elwha Dam; and "good/excellent" for the Proposed Action.
Steelhead
Affected Environment.
Steelhead are, essentially, a searun race of rainbow trout.
Winter steelhead enter the Elwha December through February, and summer steelhead migrate upstream from March through September.
Both races spawn in the spring.
Most juveniles rear in the river for two years before migrating to the ocean, although some may rear for one to three years.
Approximately 5% of adults migrating upstream have spawned before.
Adults that spawn and return to the ocean are called "kelts" on their trip out to sea.
Pg. 58 = pg. 58
Steelhead adults use a wider size range of spawning gravel than coho or chinook.
They are also able to spawn in mainstream rivers or tributaries.
Steelhead are not expected to have trouble negotiating Carlson Canyon Falls; like chinook, the falls are presumed to be the pre-dam separation point of winter and summer runs.
The summer run uses habitats upstream of these falls for spawning, the winter run downstream of the falls.
The Elwha has been stocked with hatchery steelhead since 1965, but a native Elwha River winter steelhead run remains.
It is identified by its later entry than hatchery stock, February through March, into the river.
Although the native Elwha River winter steelhead is differentiated from hatchery stock by its late entry, summer steelhead stock is not as easy to identify since there is no apparent seasonal separation of transplanted, non-native, hatchery stock.
Interior is investigating the possibility of using rainbow trout from the Elwha River above the dams to create a summer steelhead run.
These fish are native to the Elwha and may be descendants of summer or winter steelhead.
Stock availability for winter steelhead is rated "marginal/favorable" and "marginal" for summer steelhead.
Impacts to Steelhead.
Steelhead would be expected to withstand passage losses from Dam Retention (with mitigation) as well as coho salmon.
Outmigrating steelhead juveniles would be relatively large, strong swimmers not expected to be heavily preyed upon in the reservoirs.
Adult losses during upstream fish passage would be about the same as the coho.
Kelts that migrate back to sea after spawning may encounter low flow conditions and, consequently, some losses.
As with coho, steelhead juveniles would experience some mortality from predation and other factors as they mature in the river, and some would residualize in the reservoirs.
Some mortalities would occur during passage past fish screens (FERC, p.4-25).
Removal of the Glines Canyon Dam would resupply the middle stretch of the Elwha with spawning gravel as well as woody debris.
However, the lower Elwha would continue to be gravel starved, and important riverine habitat inundated by Lake Aldwell would not be restored.
As with coho salmon, this combination results in a "marginal to favorable" rating for steelhead habitat under this alternative.
Removal of the Elwha Dam would resupply the lower river with gravel from the sediments built up behind Elwha Dam resulting in a short-term improvement in habitat before sediments eventually washed out to sea.
Gravel, some woody debris, and nutrients would remain trapped behind Glines Canyon Dam and 2.8 miles of riverine habitat would remain inundated by Lake Mills.
Although summer steelhead habitat above Glines Canyon Dam would remain intact and in excellent condition, adults and juveniles would need to negotiate poor quality habitat in the lower and middle reaches.
For these reasons, habitat is rated as "marginal" for both winter and summer steelhead.
The Proposed Action would eliminate problems with passage and fully restore the habitat for winter and summer steelhead.
Chances of restoring winter steelhead are "excellent" for the Proposed Action, "fair" for either the Dam Retention or Remove Elwha Dam alternative, and "good" for the Remove Glines Canyon Dam option.
For summer steelhead, chances for full restoration if Proposed Action is implemented are "good," "fair" for either Remove Elwha Dam or Retain Both Dams and "good" for the Remove Glines Canyon Dam alternative.
Pg. 59 = pg. 59
Sockeye Salmon
Affected Environment.
Sockeye salmon require a freshwater lake or lake-like environment to complete their reproductive cycle.
The only natural lake accessible from the Elwha River is Lake Sutherland.
It is drained by Indian Creek, a tributary of the Elwha which enters at river mile 7.5, between the two dams.
Since Lake Sutherland has been developed, spawning habitat in the lake or in tributaries upstream is in poor condition.
For this reason, habitat for sockeye is rated as "unfavorable/marginal" under all scenarios.
Although a stable population of naturally spawning kokanee, or landlocked sockeye, remains in the lake, Interior is investigating whether the kokanee has the characteristics needed as brood stock for Elwha River sockeye.
Some of these kokanee may be descendants of Elwha River sockeye, but this is unknown and complicated by the many lake plantings of non-native kokanee.
Chances of locating an appropriate stock are rated as "unfavorable/marginal."
Impacts.
Sockeye smolts tend to lose scales more easily than other native anadromous salmon (FERC, p.4-31), and would have more trouble negotiating the fish screens proposed for Elwha Dam.
With Removal of the Elwha Dam, passage problems would be entirely eliminated since this species would veer off toward Lake Sutherland and not continue upriver to Glines Canyon Dam.
Passage under the Removal of the Elwha Dam or the Proposed Action is considered "favorable;" it is considered "unfavorable/marginal" for the Removal of the Glines Canyon Dam and Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternatives, and "none" for the No Action alternative.
Only Removal of Elwha Dam or the Proposed Action results in a "fair" chance for sockeye salmon restoration, with all other alternatives rating either "poor" or "none."
Resident Species
Affected Environment.
Rainbow trout, native char, and small populations of cutthroat and brook trout occupy the upper Elwha.
Rainbow trout also use the reservoirs and middle reach of the river.
These are nonanadromous populations of trout, although the impulse for rainbow or native char to migrate to sea may remain.
Impacts.
Since reintroduction of native anadromous trout and salmon would increase competition for available food and habitat, resident populations would be expected to decline to historically low population levels.
In the Proposed Action alternative, this loss would be completely offset through improved habitat and the increased number of native anadromous trout and salmon available for fishers.
However, in the Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternative, the restoration of native anadromous species would not make up for the loss of resident trout and native char (FERC, p.4-68).
Cumulative Impacts
Overall harvest of salmon and trout, warmer than normal waters caused by El Nino, logging, development, water diversions, agricultural activities, removal of riparian vegetation, and bank hardening to protect roads and private and public property in the river all have a cumulative, or additive, effect on fisheries.
These stresses, in addition to the loss of 93% of the Elwha River drainage after the Elwha Dam was built in 1910, have resulted in depressed catches of many species of salmon and seagoing trout in the Puget Sound area.
Pg. 60 = pg. 60
Dwindling or even decimated populations of salmon occur in spots along the entire west coast.
Most small streams on the West Coast have been damaged from urbanization, water withdrawals, or other land management activities (Nehlsen et al. 1991).
This is true with the large rivers, as well.
As a result, very few pristine watersheds are left in the United States.
Unlike most Peninsula streams, the area above Lake Mills provides salmon and steelhead pristine spawning and rearing habitat because it has been spared the adverse, long-term impacts from recent timber harvest, water use and human development that many other Peninsula streams are now experiencing.
The habitat within the park will also be preserved, as this is mandated by federal law.
The impact of these actions is evident in reduced catches and the more frequent listing of anadromous fish species as threatened or endangered.
As an example, the National Marine Fisheries Service (NMFS) recently (March, 1995) proposed wild steelhead runs from the Klamath River, California north to Port Orford, Oregon be listed as threatened under the Endangered Species Act because of population declines resulting from these factors.
Degradation of habitat caused by dams and water withdrawals has led to listings (as threatened or endangered) of salmon stocks in the Columbia River Basin and Sacramento River in California.
Salmon and anadromous trout, including those which are able to outmigrate from the Elwha River, experience impacts in the marine environment as well, in the form of commercial fishing pressure and environment changes such as El Nino.
A small percentage of Elwha River chum (5 to 15%), and larger portions of pink (60-75%), chinook (60%) and coho (approximately 77%) are taken by commercial and sport marine fishermen before they return to the Elwha River.
The impact extends beyond the U.S. border, as Pacific Coast fish produced in one area not only traverse the waters of many states, but are captured by Canadian fishermen as well.
U.S. fishermen also capture fish produced in Canada.
Because of this, harvest management occurs on the international (Pacific Salmon Treaty) level as well as on a national (Pacific Fisheries Management Council), and local (State of Washington and treaty tribes) level.
The number of fish of U.S. origin which can be caught by Canada is controlled by the Pacific Salmon Treaty.
The purposes of the Treaty are to: "prevent overfishing and provide for optimum production" and to "provide for each Party to receive benefits equivalent to the production of salmon originating in its waters."
High seas drift net fisheries, which have had a large impact on salmon fisheries worldwide, were banned internationally on December 31, 1992.
Fishing vessels, closely monitored by the U.S. Coast Guard and Canadian Pacific Maritime Forces in 1993 and 1994, have committed very few violations of the ban.
Regional, national and international fisheries management has helped to prevent overharvest of most stocks, although this does sometimes occur.
However, it remains true that most population declines of these fish have occurred because of diminished and degraded habitat.
Pg. 61 = pg. 61
Conclusion
Taking No Action would continue to limit salmon and trout to 4.9 miles of poor quality habitat.
These populations would require management through hatchery supplements and would never be self-sustaining.
In the case of pink and chum salmon, it is very likely that the populations will become extinct in the foreseeable future if present conditions continue.
Dam Retention, with Interior-specified fish passage measures over both dams, would allow access to the middle and upper Elwha for some species, but would not improve habitat for fish in the middle or lower river.
Coho and winter and summer steelhead have a "fair" chance for restoration if this alternative were implemented.
The chance for restoration for all other species is either "none," "poor," or "unknown."
As with the No Action alternative, Elwha pink and chum are likely to face extinction under this alternative.
Removal of the Glines Canyon Dam would improve habitat quality in both the lower and middle river, and would eliminate passage mortality from the larger dam and reservoir.
Mortality from Elwha Dam and Lake Aldwell would remain.
Chances for restoring steelhead are "good" under this alternative; both chinook and coho runs would have "fair" to "good" possibilities for restoration if fish passage measures were installed on Elwha Dam.
Cutthroat and char (Dolly Varden and bull trout) have "unknown" chances for restoration.
Chances for fully restoring sockeye, pink or chum salmon are "none" or "poor," with pink and chum likely to become extinct.
Removal of the Elwha Dam would give sockeye salmon better chances of restoration than either the Removal of the Glines Canyon Dam or Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternative.
However, most runs would experience difficulty passing over Glines Canyon Dam or utilizing the poor habitat in the middle stretch of river if the Removal of the Elwha Dam alternative were chosen.
Chances of chinook, coho, pink, chum and steelhead restoration are rated "poor" to "fair" if the Glines Canyon Dam remains and Elwha Dam removed.
The possibilities for reestablishing seagoing cutthroat trout or char are "unknown" for this alternative.
For the Proposed Action, passage mortality would drop to zero and habitat along the entire river would be restored, including the 5.3 miles now inundated by the reservoirs.
All runs for which native stock is readily available have "excellent" chances for restoration, including winter steelhead and summer/fall chinook salmon.
Chances for restoring coho are "good" to "excellent," and "good" for all remaining runs except sockeye salmon.
Since suitable sockeye stock is questionable and lake habitat is poor, chances for sockeye restoration are rated "poor" to "fair."
Living Marine Resources
Affected Environment
Living marine resources include shellfish, echinoderms, marine algae, fish, and mammals.
Hardshell clams, such as littleneck, butter, and horse clams, are the most commonly pursued species in the area, although the season is often closed due to persistent red tide incidents (FERC, p.3-47).
Littleneck and butter clams prefer gravel- to boulder-sized substrate, while horse clams prefer sandy substrate.
Although species composition and abundance prior to dam construction is not known, clams may have been more abundant than at present because of substrate changes due to bedload sediment starvation (Elwha Report, p.15).
Pg. 62 = pg. 62
At the river mouth, the nearshore environment is composed primarily of cobbles and boulders, while the offshore bottom is mostly sand and gravel (Schwartz, 1994).
A suspended sediment plume from the river's discharge drifts to either the northwest or to the northeast depending on tide and currents.
To the east of the river mouth for approximately one mile, the upper beach is steep with high wave energy, and plant and animal use is limited.
This beach area is composed primarily of cobbles with some gravel.
The lower beach supports a healthy community of marine flora, including more than 20 species of brown, red, and green algae and a number of attached animals, such as snails, limpets, barnacles, mussels, and chitons (letter from G. Ging, USFWS, August 1994).
Starting near river mile 1, a natural band of actively eroding bluffs contributes large amounts of suspended sediments to the surf.
In general, the nearshore marine community includes fish such as salmon, greenling, flatfish, rockfish, sculpins, clingfish, sand lance, herring; more than 50 species of marine algae (including kelp); birds, including gulls, common murres, marbled murrelets, rhinoceros auklets, and harlequin ducks; and mammals including the Pacific harbor seal and, infrequently, Steller and California sea lions, orcas, and gray whales (Calambokidis et al., 1987; USFWS, 1994).
Nearshore substrates composed of boulders and cobbles support species that prefer rocky environments, such as kelp, many species of red algae, red and yellow sponges, red rock crab, barnacles, mussels, limpets, chitons, and periwinkles.
Local kelp beds are particularly important as habitat for various species of baitfish, which are prey species for salmon.
Impacts
Clam populations have been reduced by the steepening of beaches and the loss of sands and gravels due to the trapping of sediments behind the dams (Elwha Report, p.60).
For the No Action, Dam Retention (with mitigation) or Removal of Glines Canyon Dam alternatives, there would be no changes in the river's sediment output, and thus no changes in existing clam populations would be expected (FERC, p. 4-34).
The nearshore marine environment would continue to be dominated by species that prefer a rocky environment--kelp, rock crab, barnacles, and mussels.
Removing only Elwha Dam would create a temporary increase in sand and gravel.
Long-term natural sediment transport would continue to be blocked by the presence of Glines Canyon Dam.
Currently, the Elwha River has very little estuary.
The river flows almost directly into salt water with little salinity transition area or characteristic estuarine habitat types (e.g., eel grass beds, shallow fine sediment pools).
Less than 300 feet of river mouth area has estuarine characteristics, and there is little use as a fish nursery.
This condition would continue under the No Action, Dam Retention, and Removal of Elwha Dam alternatives, as re-establishing the Elwha River estuary requires the return of natural sediment transport conditions.
With Removal of Glines Canyon Dam, stored sediments could be flushed out naturally and fill Lake Aldwell within 40-50 years.
If the Elwha Dam remains, sediment could eventually fill Lake Aldwell and require pumping or dredging around the dam to prevent wear on the turbines.
Although this is likely to be unreasonably expensive for the dam owners (see Response to Comments for more information), impacts from this alternative to marine resources could be similar to Proposed Action in the very long term.
Pg. 63 = pg. 64
If the Proposed Action were selected, the short term impacts to marine resources would depend on the sediment management option selected.
A range of options would be examined in detail in the Implementation EIS.
These options include allowing sediment to erode naturally, stabilizing it in place, mechanical removal (probably by dredge and slurry via pipeline).
If sediment naturally eroded, 9-12 million cubic yards of stored sediment would eventually washout into the river, delta, and Strait of Juan de Fuca.
Mechanical removal may require a marine outfall for fine-grained sediment and sand.
Suspended sediment would wash out of the reservoirs during dam removal and for a period of six months following dam removal, depending on weather and sediment management methods.
Bedload (sand, gravel, cobbles) would be transported to the river mouth over a period of years, and the coarser cobbles and boulders would take decades to disperse downriver.
Sand, gravel, and cobbles stored behind the dams would erode downstream, eventually reaching the mouth, rebuilding the pre-dam delta.
Current estimates are that the delta would build 100-500 feet seaward from the river mouth.
Waves, tidal currents, and river discharge would re-form the sediment deposited offshore into typical estuarine conditions with barrier bars and shallows.
Areas within the bars would receive fresh water from the river and saltwater flows during flood tides.
The inflowing salt water would carry nutrients supporting the rich ecology typical of estuaries.
This transition area would be essential to complete restoration of Elwha River salmonids whose juveniles require a brackish environment before they begin their lives in salt water, as well as to other marine species that use or reproduce in an estuarine environment (including Dungeness crab).
Plant and animal components would change accordingly (e.g., from kelp, rock crab, barnacles, and mussels to eelgrass, Dungeness crab, and flatfish).
Upriver from the mouth, deposits of sand and larger sediment would result in the mainstem channel splitting into several channels, similar to the way the river appeared on early maps of the area.
Sand would be supplied at a rate greater than the pre-dam Elwha River for the first several years after the dams are removed.
This would rapidly increase the amount of sand to beaches in the nearshore area at the river mouth and begin net longshore transport to the east.
Species most likely to be affected in the short term include macrophytic algae, barnacles, mussels, and others with limited mobility.
In the long term, the replacement of sand in the nearshore would likely increase the net area of productive intertidal habitat.
Finer silt and clay would mostly remain in suspension and become rapidly diluted with the large volume of marine water during this flushing out period.
If this material is naturally eroded, the river would appear very turbid during the removal.
This could cause intense short-term impacts on the nearshore area east of Freshwater Bay by smothering vegetation and animals and causing high turbidity in bay waters (Elwha Report, p.40).
In the near term, the abundance of macrophytic algae could drop in response to the higher turbidity, but should return to its previous level within a few years of dam removal.
Pg. 64 = pg. 65
Over time, populations of all three hardshell clam species probably would increase in the nearshore due to the increased sand and gravel sediment loads (FERC, p. 4-121).
In addition, surf smelt should benefit from the increase in spawning habitat that would result from additional sand gravel beaches.
Marine mammals would not be expected to be impacted by short-term, increased sediment loads.
Salmon and trout might be adversely affected by suspended silt and clay as they swim from the bay up the Elwha (see section on "fish" in this document).
As one means of mitigation for the short-term impacts to marine resources from dam removal, the Implementation EIS would examine using concrete rubble from the dams to create artificial marine reefs in the Strait of Juan de Fuca and/or other locations.
Cumulative Impacts to Marine Resources
Marine life well east of the Elwha River mouth has been affected by reduced sediment not only from the Elwha River, but also from the armoring in 1930 and again in 1958 of eroding sea bluffs to the east of the river mouth.
The cliffs originally supplied approximately 270,000 cubic yards of sediment to the nearshore environment each year.
This was reduced to an estimated 90,000 cubic yards annually when the bluffs were stabilized to protect a water supply line into Port Angeles.
Since the waves in the vicinity have the ability to transport 270,000 cubic yards of material per year, beaches and the nearshore habitat have been steepened and now provide a greatly reduced intertidal zone.
The intertidal zone is important for many species of fish because of its high production of prey items.
Now, larger substrate and the marine life that traditionally occupy this kind of rocky habitat (kelp, rock crab, barnacles) have replaced the original species (eelgrass, flatfish, juvenile lingcod, cragon shrimp, and Dungeness crab).
Regionally, with the significant exception of salmon stocks, there are few sources of negative impacts on marine resources.
Most of the coastal strip on the west side of the Olympic Peninsula is protected by Olympic National Park and two national wildlife refuges.
The north side of the peninsula, although not in protective land status, is relatively natural, affected primarily by sediment input from coastal logging activities.
The east side on Puget Sound is affected by logging, residential, and industrial activities.
The return of natural Elwha River salmon runs and the restoration of the river's estuary would positively affect the overall health of the marine environment.
Conclusions
If No Action is taken, or the Dam Retention (with mitigation) or the Removal of Glines Canyon Dam alternatives are adopted, the nearshore marine community would continue to be dominated by species, such as kelp, rock crab, barnacles, and mussels, that prefer a rocky environment.
Removal of Elwha Dam could flush 2-3 million cubic yards of material into the Strait of Juan de Fuca; the Proposed Action could send up to 942 million cubic yards into the Strait.
Either of these alternatives might cause short-term impacts from sediment settling on to sessile (immobile) biota, such as shellfish or vegetation.
In the long term, removing both dams could change the nearshore and estuarine community to favor species, such as eelgrass, Dungeness crab, flatfish, and hardshell clams, that require a sandy substrate.
Vegetation
Affected Environment
The project area is within the western hemlock zone, the most extensive vegetative type in western Washington and Oregon (FERC, p. 3-48).
Forests are generally dominated by western hemlock and Douglas fir.
The Elwha drainage supports a mix of plant species that is transitional between the wet western peninsula and the comparatively dry eastern peninsula.
Other common woody species include Pacific madrone, grand fir, red alder, bigleaf maple, and manzanita.
Eight vegetated land cover classes have been mapped in the vicinity: conifer forest, mixed forest, hardwood forest, deciduous shrub, grassland, palustrine (wetland) forest, palustrine shrub, and palustrine emergent.
At least 64 non-native plant species have been documented in the Elwha drainage within the national park (Elwha Report, p. 18).
Much of this vegetation lies along the riverbank and/or has adapted to the moist soil in the vicinity of the river.
This riparian vegetation is an important habitat for many species of wildlife.
Pg. 65 = pg. 66
Wetlands, or areas which are periodically saturated, in the project area are limited to the three palustrine land cover classes--forest, shrub, and emergent.
Approximately 50% of their total acreage is in Sweets Bottom (an area along the river near the park boundary), while the largest wetland area, 38 acres, is at the upstream end of Lake Aldwell (FERC, pp.3-51 and 4-125).
Wetland values include flood moderation, bank stabilization, sediment and nutrient retention, and wildlife habitat.
Impacts
Impacts from the No Action and Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternatives would be similar.
Under both alternatives, 684 acres of potential natural vegetation would remain inundated and 31 acres unavailable due to the dams and associated project facilities.
This acreage includes more than five linear miles of low elevation riparian communities and natural wetlands.
With Dam Retention (with mitigation), vegetation would be removed for construction of fish passage facilities at each dam site (Elwha Report, p.58), and an additional 189 acres of vegetation around Lake Aldwell would be modified for wildlife mitigation.
Both these alternatives would continue the loss of an estimated 48 acres of wetland vegetation and 533 acres of riparian habitat.
Of these 533 acres, 52 acres of deciduous riparian forest, and 65 acres of cobble riparian habitat remain lost through inundation or direct development.
Under the Removal of Glines Canyon Dam alternative, a total of 425 acres--416 acres at Lake Mills and 9 acres at the Glines Canyon Dam site--would be reclaimed and eventually returned to pre-dam conditions.
A 4.7-acre wetland in the vicinity of the boat launching area on Lake Mills appears to be maintained by seepage from upslope areas and probably would not be affected by removal of the dam and reservoir.
An estimated 26 acres of new wetlands would be established along the reclaimed river channel.
Riparian vegetation would also be restored, with an estimated 287 acres returned under this alternative.
Of this 287 acres, 28 acres of riparian hardwood and 35 acres of cobble/gravel riparian habitat would be reestablished.
A minimal amount of vegetation would be lost at the Elwha Dam with the construction of a fish passage facility.
The James River Corporation has proposed modifying land at Lake Aldwell for wildlife mitigation, including the creation of eight acres of wetlands, as part of their Federal Energy Regulatory Commission licensing process (these mitigation measures have been assumed as part of the action alternatives which leave one or both dams in place).
A new campground at Lake Aldwell proposed by James River, if built, would disturb an additional five acres (Elwha Report, p.47; FERC, pp. 4-165 and 4-46).
Pg. 66 = pg. 67
Under the Removal of Elwha Dam alternative, 268 acres at Lake Aldwell and 22 acres at the Elwha Dam site would be recovered to natural conditions.
A portion of the 38 acres of wetlands at the delta of Lake Aldwell could be lost, although most of this wetland is located far enough away from the delta that it would not be destroyed should the dam be removed.
Approximately 22 acres of new wetlands would be established along the reclaimed river channel.
Approximately 246 acres of riparian vegetation, including at least 24 acres of riparian hardwoods and 30 acres of cobble/gravel riparian habitat, would be restored.
A minimal amount of vegetation would be lost at Glines Canyon Dam with the construction of a trap-and-haul facility for fish mitigation.
The Proposed Action would lead to the restoration and revegetation of approximately 715 acres (FERC, p.4-^ 23), 684 acres of which are now inundated by the two reservoirs.
Following dam removal and initial sediment management, remaining sediment could be either moved out of the floodplain (the stabilization alternative) or left in place (the natural erosion and mechanical removal alternatives).
Much less material would remain in the reservoir and delta lands under the latter two alternatives than if stabilization were used.
In all three scenarios, lands within Olympic National Park would likely be hydroseeded with grasses that would immediately help control erosion and start the successional process.
Scientists estimate the sediment remaining in the reservoir and delta areas would begin to appear natural within three years, and be stabilized enough to mimic pre-dam levels of erosion within 6-10 years.
These areas could return to native plant communities similar to those that existed prior to dam construction.
Natural, early successional forests would return quickly, with mature forests taking several hundred years.
Most upland stands would be dominated by western hemlock and Douglas fir, while riparian stands would contain red alder, bigleaf maple, black cottonwood, grand fir, and willow.
Establishment of non-native plants might be an initial concern at some sites, and mitigating measures to control these species would be identified in the Implementation EIS.
The Proposed Action could eliminate or degrade some portion of the 43 acres of existing wetlands, but reestablish 48 acres of recovered wetlands in either palustrine forest or palustrine shrub communities (FERC, p.4-125).
Most of the 43 acres of wetland associated with the reservoir is on or just upstream from the Lake Aldwell delta, and would not be destroyed by either the natural erosion or mechanical removal alternatives for managing sediment.
An additional 122 acres of wet channel/river and gravel bar wetlands, and as many as 533 acres of riparian vegetation would be restored.
Of the 533 acres, an estimated 52 acres of riparian hardwood vegetation, and 65 acres of riparian cobble habitat would return.
The loss of wetlands at the reservoirs would be fully offset by the wetland habitat gained.
In addition, riparian and upland habitat would be restored and used by wildlife.
The 48 acres of wetlands would establish along side channels, sloughs and tributaries, and on a portion of the low terraces.
The natural development of palustrine emergent wetlands could occur in a few years, with palustrine shrub and forested wetlands taking 10 and 20 years to develop, respectively.
Pg. 67 = pg. 68
Before any dam removal scenario would be implemented, the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers would require inventory and mapping of wetlands, and would consider options for mitigating any that may be lost.
This could include replacement in kind, creating additional wetlands within former lake beds or other appropriate areas, or possibly determining that the net gain in wetlands is mitigation enough.
Mitigation would be further explored in the Implementation EIS and in the permitting phase of the project.
Cumulative Impacts to Vegetation
Filling of the reservoirs destroyed more than five linear miles of low elevation (less than 600 feet) riparian and wetland communities.
Many other low elevation riparian communities on the Olympic Peninsula have been impacted through the removal of natural forest vegetation.
Most areas are in various stages of forest regrowth, but remain in active logging rotations.
With the exception of some west side rivers, no low elevation riparian areas on the peninsula are managed for natural conditions and long-term protection.
Recovered river bottom lands in Lake Mills and Lake Aldwell would be managed for long-term protection under the Proposed Action.
Conclusions
If No Action is taken, 715 acres of potential native forest and more than 5 linear miles of low riparian and wetlands communities would continue to be inundated by the reservoirs or affected by the dams and their facilities.
If the Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternative is selected, these lands would continue to be affected, although 189 acres of vegetation around Lake Aldwell would be modified for wildlife mitigation.
The No Action alternative has resulted and would continue to result in the loss of an estimated 48 acres of wetland, and as many as 533 acres of riparian vegetation, including at least 52 acres of hardwoods, and 65 acres of riparian cobble habitat.
The Dam Retention alternative would continue these same losses.
Both of these alternatives may have helped to create some portion of the 43 acres of wetlands near the two reservoirs, although most recent evidence suggests the portion attributable to the reservoirs may be quite small.
With Removal of Elwha Dam, 290 acres of land would be revegetated, a portion of the 38 acres of wetland associated with Lake Aldwell lost, and 22 acres of wetlands recovered.
Most of the remaining area, 246 acres, would return to riparian vegetation, with at least 24 acres of riparian hardwood and 30 acres of riparian cobble habitat restored.
Removing Glines Canyon Dam would add 425 acres of terrestrial habitat and 26 acres of wetlands.
It may degrade or eliminate 4.7 acres of wetland habitat, although recent evidence suggests it would not.
It would likely restore 287 acres of riparian vegetation, including 28 acres of riparian hardwoods and 35 acres of riparian cobble habitat.
If the Proposed Action is selected, 715 acres of habitat, including 48 acres of wetlands, would be restored.
Removing the dams could degrade or eliminate some of the existing 43 acres of wetlands near the reservoirs, but recent evidence suggests only a small portion are tied to the existence of the reservoirs.
An additional 122 acres of wet channel and gravel bar wetlands and up to 533 acres of riparian vegetation, including 52 acres of riparian hardwoods, and 65 acres of riparian cobble would be restored if the dams were removed.
Scientists estimate the sediment remaining in the reservoir and delta areas would begin to appear natural within three years of dam removal, and be stabilized enough to mimic pre-dam levels of erosion within 6-10 years.
Pg. 68 = pg. 69
Wildlife
Affected Environment
The Elwha area supports a variety of birds, large and small mammals, amphibians, and reptiles.
One of the large mammals is Roosevelt elk; important elk calving areas are at the mouth of Cat Creek, at the upstream end of Lake Mills, and near Altaire Campground just below Glines Canyon Dam (Elwha Report, p.19).
Small mammals include beaver, mink, river otter, and pine marten.
Birds include numerous passerines, waterfowl, raptors, and marine species.
In the upper Elwha, populations of fish-eating (or carcass-eating) wildlife species probably decreased when salmon and trout were blocked by the dams, although records were not kept at the time.
At least 22 species feed in whole or in part on salmon or their carcasses, including black bear, bald eagle, mink, river otter, Pacific fisher, pine marten, long-tailed weasel, belted kingfisher, and common merganser.
On Lake Aldwell, while neither threatened nor endangered, a wintering population of trumpeter swans is of local concern.
These swans, also known to use Lake Mills, have recently numbered up to 60 (letter from L. Gillette and M. Jordan, The Trumpeter Swan Society, Maple Plain, Minnesota, May 14, 1994).
They are part of the Pacific Coast population, currently numbering an estimated 13,500 birds, with 2,000 wintering in western Washington.
They use a variety of habitat types including agricultural fields, forested wetlands, ponds, lakes, and estuaries.
Although this species was hunted to near extinction by the early 1930s, conservation efforts have slowly rebuilt population levels.
As a result, trumpeter swans appear to be relatively stable or increasing in numbers.
In 1990-1992, sightings of trumpeters in winter index areas of the Pacific Coast region were already above year 2001 North American Waterfowl Management Plan goals of 10,000 birds.
In addition to wintering in open water areas surrounded by forest, trumpeter swans occupy wet agricultural lands.
Individual colonies of wintering swans move from field to field or from one forest pond or bay to another.
Attributes of winter habitat that trigger movement from one area to another, or which make an area attractive to a colony, are not well understood.
Lake Aldwell, only recently utilized by the swans, is not high quality or natural habitat for this species.
Impacts
Under the No Action alternative, a total of 684 acres of terrestrial wildlife habitat would remain inundated and another 31 acres unavailable due to dam and facility use.
Important bottom land riparian habitat would continue to be unavailable for winter elk use.
No wildlife mitigation would be done under this alternative.
In the upper and middle drainage, up to 22 wildlife species that use salmon as food would continue to be adversely impacted.
Swans and other waterfowl would continue to use the reservoirs as winter habitat, although the reservoirs provide low quality habitat because the shoreline is steep and most of the water is deep.
Dam Retention (with mitigation) would be the same as the No Action alternative except that 189 acres of lands around Lake Aldwell would be managed to benefit wildlife species, and the partial restoration of salmon runs would benefit wildlife that feed on salmon carcasses, live fish, or fish eggs.
(Elwha Report, p.59; FERC, p.4-47).
Pg. 69 = pg. 71
Impacts to wildlife from either the Removal of Glines Canyon Dam or Removal of Elwha Dam would be similar.
Removing Elwha Dam would result in the eventual restoration of 268 acres under Lake Aldwell, while removing Glines Canyon Dam would restore 415 acres under Lake Mills.
These areas would return to bottom land riparian vegetation, important as winter elk range.
Both alternatives would likely restore some salmon stocks, with expected restoration more beneficial to wildlife species that use carcasses, live fish or eggs if Glines Canyon Dam is removed.
Under both alternatives, 189 acres near Lake Aldwell would be managed to benefit wildlife.
Swans would continue to use Lake Aldwell as winter habitat if Glines Canyon Dam were removed, but would lose this habitat if Elwha Dam were removed.
(FERC, pp.4-167 and 4-196).
The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission used a habitat evaluation procedure to model habitat changes for nine representative species: elk, deer, mink, beaver, Douglas squirrel, Cooper's hawk, lesser scaup, pileated woodpecker, and yellow warbler.
In a study area including the reservoirs and some surrounding lands, net habitat would increase under the Proposed Action for all species except the lesser scaup (FERC, p.4-131).
Species that prefer lake habitat, such as scaups, mallard ducks, bufflehead, Barrow's goldeneye, merganser, and river otter, would suffer some negative impacts; species preferring river, riparian, and upland habitats would be positively affected.
A swift-flowing stream filled with salmon is important habitat for beaver, muskrat, and river otter.
To varying degrees, most species now using the reservoirs would also use riverine habitat.
The removal of both dams and reservoirs would benefit many more species of wildlife than would be adversely affected.
Restoration of native anadromous fish runs and the subsequent availability of salmon as prey in the middle and upper Elwha would benefit at least 22 wildlife species known to use this food source (Elwha Report, p.59).
If Proposed Action were implemented, total biomass from returning salmon would increase to approximately 12 times more than the current level (FERC, p.4-135).
Salmonid eggs, fry, and juveniles will benefit a variety of native wildlife.
As nutrients from salmon carcasses returned to the river, aquatic insects and species that feed on them would be expected to return; these species include amphibian larvae, spotted sandpipers, dippers, and harlequin ducks.
Birds and mammals that feed on young fish include mergansers, great blue herons, belted kingfishers, otters, and mink.
Increases in visitor use which would accompany the restoration of the salmonid recreational fishery in the Elwha River could have some adverse impacts on wildlife and species of special concern in the park.
However, these would be more than offset by the return of 715 acres of habitat to natural riverine conditions.
Draining the reservoirs and revegetating the restored lands would create more elk habitat, including important bottom land riparian areas.
It would also extend the elk migration corridor connecting high elevation subalpine park lands with low elevation forests farther down the Elwha valley.
The trumpeter swan winter habitat that Lake Aldwell and, to a lesser extent, Lake Mills provides would be lost if Proposed Action or Single Dam Removal alternatives were chosen.
In the context of the Pacific Coast population of swans, which comprises roughly 75% of the entire North American population, this impact would be minor.
However, if both reservoirs were drained, the local population would be forced to relocate.
Mitigation options for the loss of this habitat, if required, will be explored in the Implementation EIS. Pg. 70 = pg. 72
Cumulative Impacts
Based on habitat modeling, existing elk winter forage in the project vicinity is limiting, and habitat quality is low (FERC, p.3-53).
Subpopulations are considered vulnerable due to their low numbers and to increasing development on winter range adjoining the national park.
In the reservoir areas, short-term recovery of grazing habitat and long-term recovery of mature forest stands for thermal cover (an essential component of winter habitat) would benefit the local elk subpopulation.
Various wildlife species in the vicinity of the northern park boundary would be increasingly impacted through the conversion of land use from natural conditions to human activities.
The revegetation and long term protective management of 425 acres at Lake Mills in Olympic National Park and river corridor lands through Lake Aldwell would benefit many wildlife species.
Conclusions
Wildlife would benefit from the revegetation of reservoir lands and reintroduction of salmon and seagoing trout into the Elwha River ecosystem.
The Proposed Action would restore the greatest number of acres and highest levels of fish, with the greatest positive impact on wildlife of all the alternatives.
Wildlife would benefit progressively less from the (1) Removal of Glines Canyon Dam, (2) Removal of Elwha Dam, and (3) Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternatives.
Species of Special Concern
Affected Environment
Four federally threatened species inhabit the area--the northern spotted owl, marbled murrelet, bald eagle, and Steller sea lion.
One federally protected species, the peregrine falcon, migrates through the area.
Three additional species have been petitioned for federal listing--the Elwha pink salmon, coastal coho salmon, and coastal steelhead.
Species which are candidates for federal listing are the Pacific fisher, harlequin duck, northern goshawk, Cotton's milk-vetch, and bull trout.
Candidates for state listing are the pileated woodpecker, common loon, and Vaux's swift.
State-monitored species in the
area are osprey, great blue heron, barred owl, turkey vulture, Pacific harbor seal, orca, and grape fern (Elwha Report, p.19; WDFW 1993; FERC, p.3-60).
Five sensitive plant species may occur in the area (FFRC, p.3-63): porcupine sedge, tall bugbane, giant helleborine, water lobelia, and branching montia.
Surveys conducted in July and August 1990 located nine giant helleborine plants between the road to Whiskey Bend and the bypass reach in the area of Glines Canyon Dam (FERC, p.3-64).
Additionally, 14 plant species reported to occur in the Elwha valley are considered rare or extremely rare within Olympic National Park boundaries (C. Hoffman, personal communication, August, 1994).
Northern spotted owl surveys have found seven pairs between the Elwha headwaters and the national park boundary (FERC 3-59), two active nests located within 2.2 miles of the river and Lake Mills, and at least one additional nest between U.S. Highway 101 and Lake Aldwell (USFS, personal communication, June 1994).
Pg. 71 = pg. 73
Bald eagles are observed year-round in the area, and two nest sites are just east of the mouth of the river (FERC, p.3-58).
Eagle densities generally decrease farther from the sea.
Prey are primarily marine birds, chinook salmon carcasses in the lower river, resident fish in the reservoirs, and carrion, particularly elk and heron.
Marbled murrelets are primarily marine birds although they nest in semi-colonial aggregates in inland, old-growth forest stands (Federal Register 1992) and feed on fish and invertebrates in nearshore marine waters.
Significant numbers of marbled murrelets feed in Freshwater Bay.
Murrelets surveyed from March through September 1990 were estimated at 15 pairs in the upper Elwha River valley or tributaries during the breeding season (FERC, p. 3-59).
From Krause Bottom above Lake Mills to the river mouth, the river appears to be used primarily as a travel corridor, with little nesting along the path.
However, there were possible nest sites in stands along Boulder, Cat, and Stukey creeks, and above Altaire Campground.
No murrelets were observed on either reservoir.
Surveys for spotted owls and marbled murrelets are ongoing.
However, neither the developed areas where the hydroelectric project facilities are located nor the open water habitat offered by the reservoirs are considered suitable habitat for the spotted owls or murrelets.
Survey data supports that there are no northern spotted owl nests within approximately one mile of either dam.
Because of the distance between the dams and spotted owl nest sites, it is unlikely that owls would be affected by project removal activities, particularly with equipment modified to reduce noise levels.
If required, such modifications or other mitigation measures would be developed in the Implementation EIS or permitting phase of the project, could include timing restrictions and/or routing access roads to avoid nest sites.
The basis of determining which mitigation is required will be a biological assessment submitted to the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
Impacts
In the short term, marbled murrelets could be affected by increased turbidity following dam removal or installation of fish passage measures if the muddier water makes it more difficult for them to see and catch prey or reduces the number of prey (small fish and crustaceans).
In the long term, additional forest acres (Single Dam Removal or Proposed Action) in the reservoir areas would have a beneficial effect on northern spotted owls and marbled murrelets.
The renewed availability of salmon carcasses would be expected to increase the number of wintering bald eagles along the middle sections of the river.
Fish species petitioned for listing under the Endangered Species Act could be negatively affected in the short term if sediment management resulted in pulses of sediment carried downriver.
Mitigation for these impacts would be analyzed in the Implementation EIS.
Both the No Action and the Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternatives would continue to negatively impact several federally listed species by inundation of habitat and dramatically reduced salmon and trout as prey.
Bald eagles, for example, eat salmon; spotted owls and marbled murrelets use mature forests for nesting.
Coho and pink salmon and steelhead would continue to be directly affected by the loss of freshwater habitat.
Although Removal of Glines Canyon Dam or Removal of Elwha Dam would improve conditions for these species of special concern, these alternatives would not restore the fisheries or habitat to pre-dam conditions, thus sustaining some negative impacts on the species.
(Elwha Report, pp. 47 and 51; FERC, pp. 4-172 and 4-200).
Only Proposed Action would fully restore the species's natural freshwater habitat in the Elwha River.
Pg. 72 = pg. 74
Cumulative Impacts
Spotted owls and marbled murrelets have been impacted primarily through the logging of old-growth and mature forest communities.
The consequence of continued logging activity in their habitat is currently an issue of local, regional, and national debate (USFS and BLM, 1994).
However, it is mainly fragmentation of old-growth forests at issue.
Since all alternatives except the Proposed Action would continue to prevent restoration of natural successional (and eventually old-growth) forests, they would have added negative impacts on owls and murrelets.
Bald eagle populations, recovered from their lowest levels in the 1970s, have been upgraded from endangered to threatened species status.
Restoration of the salmonid fisheries in the Elwha River would support this trend.
The petitioned and candidate fish species would probably suffer some short-term adverse effects from alternatives involving dam removal.
If lake levels were drawn down, the middle and lower reaches of the Elwha River would carry more sand and silt, covering the gravel substrate that these species use for spawning.
Over the longer term, however, dam removal and river restoration would offset cumulative impacts to these species elsewhere on the Olympic Peninsula.
Causes of cumulative impacts that have lowered populations of petitioned and candidate species to critical levels are not certain but include sedimentation, overharvesting, and water pollution.
Conclusions
In the short term, construction noise and suspended sediment in the river have the potential to impact nesting owls and murrelets, Elwha pink and coastal coho salmon, coastal steelhead, and bald eagles.
Mitigation measures would be developed through consultation with the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service and other federal and state agencies, and addressed in the Implementation EIS or permitting phase of one project.
In the long term, the Proposed Action would improve conditions for spotted owls, marbled murrelets, and bald eagles.
Spotted owls and marbled murrelets would benefit from the restoration of forest habitat, and eagles from the restoration of native anadromous fish as prey.
Coho and pink salmon and steelhead would benefit directly from the recovery of riverine habitat.
All other alternatives would continue to exert negative impacts on these species, with No Action the most severe through continued habitat inundation and the absence of salmon runs as a source of prey.
The Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternative would restore a limited number of salmon and trout to benefit federally listed species more than No Action.
Single dam removal alternatives are slightly better, with the Removal of Glines Canyon Dam restoring more fish and more upland habitat than the Removal of Elwha Dam.
Cultural Resources
Affected Environment
Research has revealed the presence of many more resources within the project area than described (P. Gleeson, Olympic National Park, personal communication, August 1994) by either the Draft Staff Report or the Elwha Report.
Cultural resources include structures, landscapes, traditional cultural properties, ethnographic sites, ethnohistoric sites, and archeological sites, representing a continuous occupation from centuries past.
They also demonstrate the importance of the Elwha River, which provided sustenance to the valley's inhabitants and served as a transportation corridor into the heart of the Olympic Peninsula.
Pg. 73 = pg. 75
The Elwha River is central to the culture of the Lower Elwha SKlallam Tribe.
As shown by archeological evidence and oral tradition, the Elwha S'Klallam were living along the Elwha River and coastal portions of the river basin long before the arrival of Euro-Americans.
S'Klallam villages were located adjacent to important fishing stations at Ediz Hook, the mouth of the Elwha River, and at the confluence of Indian Creek and the Elwha in the upper Elwha valley.
Seasonal camps for fishing and other subsistence activities were located along the Elwha River and its tributaries, and along the shores of Freshwater Bay and Ediz Hook.
Trails used by the S'Klallam followed the Elwha and its tributaries into the high country of the Olympic Mountains, where the S'Klallam sometimes met with the Skokomish, Quinault, and other tribes during hunting and berry picking expeditions.
The river, the fish, and certain locations along the river were central in the cultural life of the Elwha S'Klallam.
S'Klallam were still living at the confluence of Indian Creek and the Elwha River when construction of the Elwha Dam began.
Euro-American settlers were drawn to the resources of the river valley and began to homestead in the mid 19th century, but found climate and the tenacity of natural vegetation limiting.
The S'Klallam, who at that time were not U.S. citizens, initially found themselves unable to obtain legal papers for homesteads on their ancestral homelands.
With the assistance of Euro-American homesteaders and passage of an effective Indian homestead law in 1884, tribal members overcame the legal obstacles; by 1894, ten family heads received trust patents to approximately 1,300 acres of land in the lowlands of the Elwha valley and on Freshwater Bay.
Prior to the destruction of the anadromous fish runs by the dams, the Elwha River fisheries remained the mainstay of the S'Klallam economy.
In 1890, Thomas T. Aldwell moved from Canada, by way of Seattle and Port Townsend, to Port Angeles.
In 1894, Aldwell recognized the potential for a power site on a claim he had purchased on the Elwha River and began acquiring lands necessary to build a hydroelectric dam and reservoir.
In 1910, Aldwell and George A. Glines formed the Olympic Power and Development Company to build a dam and power plant.
Backed by eastern financiers, construction got underway that same year.
Despite failure of the Elwha Dam's original foundation in 1912, the dam and power plant were completed in 1914.
From 1926 to 1927, a second dam and power plant were constructed at Glines Canyon, 8.5 miles upriver from the Elwha Dam.
Despite existing state laws requiring fish passage, neither dam included such measures.
For some members of the Port Angeles community, the dams became part of their family history because family members worked on the construction or lived in the valley during construction.
The dams' place on the National Register of Historic Places is a source of pride to some residents.
While the hydroelectric developments provided power for consumers in Port Angeles, the character of the river and the valley was radically changed.
The dams destroyed anadromous salmon and trout.
Loss of the Elwha as a free flowing river cut to the core of S'Klallam spiritual existence and damaged a fishery vital to their economy.
Tribal members lost access to sacred sites where the Creator made the Elwha S'Klallam and where they went to purify themselves and receive spiritual guidance.
The reservoirs behind the dams inundated at least one S'Klallam settlement site, seasonal camps, and possibly burial grounds as well as habitat for many resources including fish, land game, and plants used for food, medicine, and raw materials.
Pg. 74 = pg. 76
S'Klallam and non-Indian residents suffered significant losses when the dam failed during construction in 1912.
A primary bridge crossing over the Elwha was washed away and a mill was damaged.
All of one Indian homesteader's property was swept away by the resulting flood.
Other homesteaders had topsoil washed away and farm fields covered with debris.
Some people later moved their houses to higher ground.
Operation of the power plants not only blocked fish access to most of the Elwha River, but affected fish in the river downstream of the dams through the periodic reduction in flows.
Spawning grounds were left without water, and fish stranded away from the river.
Today, cultural resources considered historically important include the hydropower projects themselves, home sites, Elwha Ranger Station, Elwha and Altaire campgrounds, the one-lane Elwha River Bridge, and the two dam complexes.
Elwha and Glines Canyon dams are listed on the National Register of Historic Places, significant for their associations with the rapidly evolving technology of power generation and the organizations that were formed to develop and distribute power.
In addition, the Elwha River plant is an example of a low head hydroelectric system and a rare, early multiple-buttress type dam.
The Elwha River Hydroelectric Power Plant Historic District includes the dam and both spillways, the five penstocks, and powerhouse.
Glines Canyon Hydroelectric Historic District includes the dam and spillway, intake, powerhouse, gate house, and surge tank.
Impacts
Under the No Action alternative, no changes would take place in the Elwha River Hydroelectric Power Plant Historic District, Glines Canyon Hydroelectric Historic District, or other historic sites.
Members of the Lower Elwha S'Klallam Tribe would continue to suffer the loss of important tribal resources integral to their traditions and culture; sacred land would remain inundated or inaccessible through continued damming of the river.
Fluctuations in lake level could also result in the further erosion of archeological sites.
Under the Dam Retention (with mitigation) alternative, both dams would be modified: the Elwha Dam with a fish ladder and Glines Canyon with the addition of trap-and-haul facilities.
These actions, compatible with hydroelectric use, would not be expected to affect the dams' listings on the National Register.
Fish ladders would improve survival rates for some stocks, but not sufficiently to provide substantial fish harvests for tribal members, commercial fishers, and recreationists.
Access to inundated traditional use and spiritual sites would continue to be denied.
Removal of Elwha Dam would result in the loss of a property listed in the National Register of Historic Places--"a historically significant example of a low head hydroelectric system in Washington State from the early 20th century.
The blowout and reconstruction of the original dam foundation is noteworthy because it represents a failure of early engineering and a successful response to that failure" (Elwha Report, Appendix L).
This alternative would require modification of Glines Canyon Dam to allow fish passage, an action which is not expected to affect its eligibility for listing.
